CHAPTER XI 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


There is a final limit beyond 
which the principle of reducing the size 
of the reading matter cannot be carried. 
This limit is reached in "filmslide" or 
microcopying. The name "filmslide" or 
"filmstat" has come to be applied to a 
process of copying on film and reading by 
projection. The word "microcopying" would 


. be more appropriate if glass should come 


in as a photographic material. 


Resolving Power of Emulsion 
The technological limit of reduc- 


TOMO pEimtaicy fixedy bys theisize or the 
grain on a photographic emulsion.+ The 
dark portions of a photograph are made up 
of clots of small particles of metallic 
silver embedded in dry gelatin. The rela-— 
tion between the size of these grains and 
the possible extent of photographic reduc- 
tion of reading matter can be graphically 
illustrated if one imagines that he has 
before him a level table top and a few 
handfuls of sand, and wants to form let- 
ters on the table top by laying down lines 
of loose sand. If the sand is very fine- 
grained, like powder, he will be able to 
make smaller letters than if the sand is 
coarse-grained or gravelly. But no matter 
how fine the sand there will be a limit, a 
size of letter, in which the grains from 
the different strokes of the writing will 
run together, the hollows inside the "d's" 
and the "e's" fill up. Letters the size 
of these printed on this page could not be 


1. Mr. Verneur Pratt, of International Filmbook Corporation, comments on this statement: 
ion, the size of the grain in the original emulsion is not the technological limit. 
the present process positive film, either of Eastman, DuPont, Gaevert, or others, is sufficiently 
fine to permit of reductions up to fifty diameters....Our experience is that the reason the develop- 
ing laboratories cannot secure clean-cut and distinct letters at high ratios of minification is found 


within the process itself... 





formed from loose sand on a table top, no 
matter how much care were used. The cor- 
responding limit is found in reducing news- 
print on photographic film. When the re- 
duction is carried below twenty diameters, 
the letters begin to blur over; at twenty- 
five diameters the blurring is very notice- 
able; at thirty-six diameters, if the great- 
est care is used, the words are still suf- 
ficiently formed to permit faintly legible 
enlargements to be made. Beyond that, ev-—- 
erything runs together. 




















Reduction Ratio in Copying 
The limit set by the grain of the 


film to the possibility of making photo- 
graphic reductions of reading matter can 
be called the "resolving power" of the 
film. The standard scientific measure for 
resolving power is in lines per millimeter, 
but this proves to be too refined a meas-— 
urement for studying the practical useful- 
ness of apparatus on the market under nor- 
mal working or library conditions. Since 
the final term in the whole process is a 
legible projected image, a rough index of 
the legibility of the product can be used 
to make a comparison of films, cameras and 
treatments of film. Again the newsprint 
can be taken as a standard, and the effi- 
ciency of a microcopying process or materi- 
al can be stated in terms of_the number of 
diameters of reduction of 7-point news- 
print; this number will be called the "re- 
CUCTIOn era tl On tl one Cane cuc GlOMmme namaste 





"In our opin- 
We believe that 


Our contention is that the individual grains are quite small enough for 


all practical purposes before development; but that when developed in the ordinary manner, these 
grains clot together in clumps....We believe that the future of microcopies on film lies not at all 


within the province of present film development methods." 
tirely, and to produce clean-cut microcopies at practically any ratio of minification. 


Mr. Pratt hoped to eliminate grain en- 
He suggests 


that the success of M. Dagron in making microcopies during the siege of Paris was based on a process— 
ing technique that has become a lost art because of the lack of demand for its perfection. 


eee 


4122 


for 7-point newsprint is sixteen diame- 
ters, the same material and process should 
copy 14-point type with approximately 
equal efficiency at a reduction of 25 to 
52 diameters. Note, though, that four-— 
teen-point type is not necessarily twice 
the size of a 7—point face. 

Many conditions of a page other 
than the point size of the type will extend 
or limit the possible reduction ratio. The 
body of type (whether heavy or light), the 
spacing of the letters on the line, the 
whiteness of the paper, the blackness of 
the ink, the clearness of the edges of the 
letters--all these things will control the 
resolving power of a photographic emulsion 
as applied to the microcopying of a par- 
ticular page. For every page, however, 
there is some differential which, for mi- 
crophotographic purposes, will equate it 
with newsprint. Some specific handicap in 
reduction ratio can be allotted, either to 
the newsprint or the other page, so that 
newsprint reduced by x diameters is the 
microphotographic equivalent of the other 
page reduced y diameters. The reduction 
ratio is a quantity of fundamental impor- 
tance governing all cost calculations in 
film copying. What is the highest prac-— 
ticable reduction ratio? 

The limit of the reduction ratio 
in microcopying is set by three factors: 
the resolving power of the emulsion on the 
film or glass; the resolving power of the 
lens and the mechanical perfection of the 
camera; and the workmanship in focusing, 
lighting, timing the exposure, and devel- 
oping the image. 


Process—Positive Emulsion 

The most widely used photographic 
emulsion for microcopying is the one that 
happens to be the cheapest--the "process 
positive" emulsion used in making positive 
prints in moving picture work, or in pho- 
togravure. This emulsion is manufactured 
to respond to the blacks and whites of a 
photographic negative, and is therefore 
well adapted to render the contrast of 
black and white in copying. 

For a copying problem in which 
faded ink or stained or colored paper is 
. involved, a panchromatic emulsion would be 
preferable. The emulsion used by the Rec- 
ordak Corporation for microcopying is de- 
vised to take care of a wide variety of 








METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


color contrasts. While not specifically a 
panchromatic film, it is yet more recep-— 
tive to color contrasts than ordinary proc-— 
ess positive emulsion. DuPont quarter- 
speed pan or Eastman micro-pan is recom-— 
mended for work involving color. 

There is every prospect that finer 
emulsions will become available, or that 
special processing may render the present 
emulsions capable of higher reduction ra— 
tios than they now accept in copying. But 
it remains to be seen whether the prices 
of these special emulsions or processings 
will be sufficiently close to the price of 
process positive film to make them a de- 
sirable substitute. In this chapter, ex— 
cept when otherwise stated, the kind of 
photographic emulsion under discussion is 
the process positive. 


Camera and Lens System 

The efficiency of a camera and 
lens system in affecting the reduction ra- 
tio is a product com three™ facvorscm mune 
quality of the lens itself; the adaptation 
of the mechanism for accurate focusing; 
and the success of the film-—holding mechan- 
ism in preventing a slight buckling of the 
film. All copying cameras save one hold 
the document still and make exposures one 
at a time through a lens which covers the 
whole film area on which the page is cop- 
ied. The Recordak apparatus uses a differ- 
ent principle: the documents are copied 
while in motion. The light passes through 
a slit to the moving film, and falls in a 
narrow band across the film. This optical 
system is said to simplify the elimination 
of distortion near the edges of the film. 

It is not easy to isolate these 
factors in appraising the efficiency of a 
camera and lens system, but the writer, 
after some experimentation with a number 
of cameras, has come to the conclusion 
that, taking all factors into account, it 
seems perfectly safe to regard eighteen 
diameters reduction of newsprint as well 
within the capacity of most film, appara- 
tus, and workmanship. Eighteen diameters 
reduction of newsprint should be substan- 
tially equivalent to thirty-six diameters 
reduction of fourteen-point type. 


Limits of Reduction Ratio q 


As an ultimate limit, a reduction 
of twenty-five diameters of newsprint might 





COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


125 





conceivably become practical, but at such 
great reductions another consideration 
would have to be taken into account; name- 
ty; the amount) of light that can be forced 
through a translucent film covered with 
dry gelatin emulsion without damaging it 
by overheating. 

The Eastman Company, in developing 
its Recordak copying machines for docu- 
ments and newspapers, has allowed a certain 
margin of safety by setting sixteen diame- 
fel soiombeereductLon ratio. Lt also has 
a document copying machine set to make re- 
ductions of seventeen, eighteen and four- 
tenths, and twenty-three diameters. The 
choice of certain of these ratios was prob- 
ably the consequence, not so much of lim-— 
itations of resolving power as of conven- 
ience in that ordinary business documents 
are 8" wide and will go easily on 16m. 
film if reduced seventeen diameters; while 
the newspapers are 18" wide, and will go 
eveniy on a 35mm. film (perforated on one 
side only) at the reduction ratio sixteen. 
The twenty-three diameter reduction is sat- 
isfactory for typescript and will put 50% 
more typescript on a foot of film than 
seventeen diameter reduction will put on. 

In comparing the work of different 
cameras, an arbitrary scale of legibility 
WES GIG Wil, es a@IIloysh 


A Legibility: ,All letters distinct. 
B Legibility: The edges of the letters 
begin to blur. 








C Legibility: The tops of the "o's" and 
Nats" are blotted over solid, but the 
openings are still clear in the "o's", 
Hate. Mplsts and tpte." 

D Legibility: Almost illegible. The 
epening sot. the Wstst, Nolst. nat si, 
etc., are blotted solid. Separate 
words can be deciphered but not read. 

E Legibility: Absolute illegibility. 


Then seven film copying devices 
(these devices will be described in the 
next chapter) were tested, allowance being 
made in some cases for better and poorer 
runs, or for expert and amateur workman- 
ship. The difference between the worst 
and the best workmanship was much greater 
than the difference between the worst and 
the best apparatus. The conclusions of the 
experiment can be summarized on the follow-— 
ing table. 

Another way of demonstrating the 
limits of resolving power is to microcopy 
a page and then enlarge it back to its 
original size. The loss of legibility suf- 
fered by the reducing and enlarging process 
will then show itself. 

In the following exhibits, type- 
script and newsprint have been carried by 
various cameras to varying degrees of re- 
duction and enlarged back to original size. 
These exhibits require careful explanation. 
The most instructive one is that prepared 
by Dr. L. Bendikson and Mr. E. F. Morkisch 


TABLE XXXVIII 


REDUCTION RATIO AND LEGIBILITY OF PROJECTED IMAGE OF 7-POINT NEWSPRINT 
PHOTOGRAPHED IN DIFFERENT KINDS OF MICROCOPYING CAMERAS* 











Kennedy machine at highest efficiency 








Kennedy machine at lower efficiency 
Leica camera (used by an expert) 









Leica camera (used by an amateur) 


E.K.A. camera (lowest efficiency) 


E.K.A. camera (highest efficiency) 
Filmograph 


Recordak (check copying machine) 















Recordak (newspaper copying machine) 








Draeger 
Dagron's photograph — 1870 








Eastman laboratory RO 
Cinescopie | 
Ansco -15 - ~ - 25- 




















2. The Fastman laboratories estimated on theoretical grounds that the limit of reduction should be 
about twenty-five diameters for newsprint, and made a test photograph on this scale, which had D 


legibility. 


124 





at the Huntington Library, San Marino, 
California (Figure LXIIb). 

Dr. Bendikson was furnished with a 
page (Figure LXIIa) upon which four clip- 
pings were pasted, and he was asked to re- 
duce this page by 16 diameters with his 
Leica camera and then enlarge it back to 
original size. 'But, as cam be seen, two 
of the clippings were already reduced 50% 
from original size by photo-offset. Dr. 
Bendikson was asked to enlarge these re- 
duced clippings back to twice the size in 
which they came to him. The enlargements 
are here reproduced as Figure LXIIb. At 
the top of the page are the two clippings, 
one of newsprint and the other of type- 
script, which have been passed through a 
reduction of 16 diameters; at the bottom 
GL uae page are the two clippings, valsover 
newsprint and of typescript, which have 
been passed through a reduction of 32 di- 
ameters. The difference in legibility 
that appears in the exhibit registers the 
lossot defini tilon inwutlde zines uner heer 
reduction ratio. 

Consider the number of steps, pho- 
tographic and in printing, that have 
marked the transmission of the two clip- 
pings at the bottom of the page: 


1. The original newsprint and typescript 
were photographed on a negative in a 
reduction of 50%. 

&. This negative was then burnt into the 
photo-offset metal sheet. 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


via a rubber blanket on paper. (The ap- 
pearance of newsprint in this reduction 
can be noted in Figure LIV, a page of 
the New York Times reduced 50% by photo- 
offset.) 

4. The photo-offset copies of the two 

clippings were then photographed on 

film in an additional reduction of 16 

diameters, making a total reduction of 

42 diameters from original size. 

The two clippings were then enlarged 

back 32 diameters on bromide paper. 

6. The bromide paper was then photographed 
full size on a negative for the photo- 
offset press. 

7. The negative was burnt into a metal 
sheet. 

8. The metal sheet was then inked and the 
ink transmitted via rubber blanket to 
the page of this book. 


Cl 


The superb photographic craftsman- 
ship of the Huntington Library staff may 
make the test unfair as a true comparison 
of apparatus. The clippings reproduced be- 
low were microcopied as foliows, from clip-— 
pings of newsprint and typescript by the 
Folmer Graftlex Corporation, im a reduction 
of 16 diameters, and enlarged back to nor-— 
mal size. 

These reproductions are all well 
within the zone of legibility. Buteii as 
otherwise with the clippings that have 
passed through microcopying from originals 
that were already reduced 50% (Figure 


35. The metal sheet was inked and printed LXIIc). The effective reduction from the 
FIGURE LXII 
«ence the growing demand of the StOck. 12th eosare slemior. eter 
Conservatives for an early election r e oriy ne cent tra 
and the argument of the iabor ESS. Ee a Sees ~At we 
keaders who declare that withoat Cannot nrin<g enameles cacer, Rav- 
Mr. Jacsbury they will be in a bet- Pn eon eee 
tee position to convinre the etecto- "Ee PR Leavy F.ue Sizing. on 
rate that their perty is as ioyal to he other [anc? (wescan reuro-= 
Geneva ond as antagonistic to Mus- ae j , +, 
enilrs as ths Tories. Cuce rhotocranhs and wash draw- 
Tne Labor.'es may decide tomor- x 4 balfeae wa 
ww to demanc that the government nes 27) matt one on bond naner 
pamedintehrycrnrenc, Paxtinmnsct nd. otner roucn Dinter jetotxcs 
of 14 t . 2. : 
Gite fixed whentbs Fotse socom that fold esellvy eitucst cracn— 
mousi« adjourned for its recess. The ing. 


Op ieaders contend that the 
present criais 1s such that the Cabt- 


Sixteen diameters reduction and enlargement of newsprint. 
and typescript, by Folmer Graflex Corporation 





FIGURE LXITa 


This page was reduced 16 diameters. When so reduced, it was a rec-— 


tangle the size of this figure: 
were then enlarged back exactly 
on the page were enlarged back 
and the typescript had been re- 
photo-offset before they were 


The two upper squares on the page 

16 diameters. The two lower squares 
ce diameters, because the clipping 
duced to 50% of original size by 
again reduced by photography; 


therefore the total microphotographic reduction was 32 diameters, and an en— 
largement of 52 diameters was necessary to bring them back to full size. 


Photo-offset reproduction of 
newsprint reduced 16 diameters 
and enlarged back 16 diameters. 





















—The Victorian Council Against 
War and Fascism sent a deputation 
today to the Italian Consul, Cava- 
lier Anzelotti, protesting against 
Italy's ''murderous attack upon 
helpless Abyssinians.'' 'The consul 
previously refused to see the depu- 
tation but agreed to see one repre- 
sentative. Two others forced their 
way into the room. 

The deputation declared it had 
been predicted that a Fascist gov- 
ernment would be the first to make 
war. Italy had been declared the 
aggressor in this war and unless 
the consul sent the council's for- 
mal protest to Italy, steps would 





Photo-offset reproduction of 
newsprint reduced 50% by photo- 
offset, then reduced 16 diame- 
ters by photography and enlarged 
back 32 diameters. 


Another disclosure was that the 
forty-five-pound forward anchor of 
the Penguin had been severed from 
its hawser with a sharp knife and 


Inspector King admitted it was pos 
sible that in that fact might lle the 


the surface of the wal 











Photo-offset reproduction of type- 
script reduced 16 diameters and en-— 
larged back 16 diameters. 


Stock...the same as for letter- 
press printing except that we 
cannot vrint enameled vaper hav- 
ing a heavy glue sizing. On the 
other hand, we can revroduce 
photographs and wash drawings in 


halftone on bond paner and other 
rough finish stocks that fold 
easily without cracking. 





Photo-offset reproduction of type- 
script reduced 50% by photo-offset, 
then reduced 16 diameters by pho- 
tography and enlarged back 32 di- 
ameters. 





STOCK....the same as 
printing except that we 
eled paper having a he 
the other hand, we can 

and wash drawings in h 
and other rough finis 
easily without cracking 


This page was sent to various photographers as a test sheet; this original 

is here reproduced directly by the photo-offset process; the following ex— 

hibit, Figure LXIIb, has been passed through a reduction of sixteen diame- 
ters and an enlargement of sixteen and thirty-two diameters. 


hore 
vide 


t 


& 


-, = * 





FIGURE LXIIb 


This page was reduced 16 diameters. When so reduced, it was a rec- 
tangle the size of this figure: The two upper squares on the page 
were then enlarged back exactly 16 diameters. The two lower squares 
on the page were enlarged back 32 diameters, because the clipping 
and the typescript had been re- duced to 50% of original size by 
photo-offset before they were again reduced by photography; therefore the 
total micro-photographic reduction was 32 diameters, and an enlargement of 32 
diameters was necessary to bring them back to full size. 


Photo-offset reproduction of type- 
script reduced 16 diameters and en- 
larged back 16 diameters. 


Photo-offset reproduction of 
newsprint reduced 16 diameters 
and enlarged back 16 diameters. 


—The Vietorian Council Against 
War and Fascism sent a deputation 
today to the Italian Consul, Cava- 
Her Afhszelotti, protesting against 
Italy's ''murderous attack upon 
helpless Abyssinians."" The consul 
previously refused to see the depu- 
tation but agreed to see one repre- 
sentative. Two others forced their 
into the room. 


Stock...the same as for letter- 
press printing except that we 
cannot print enameled paper hav- 
ing a heavy glue sizing. On the 
other hand, we can reproduce 
photographs and wash drawings in 


halftone on bond paper and other 


deputation declared it had 

been predicted that a Fascist gov- 
ernment would be the first to make 
deciared the 


rough finish stocks that fold 
easily without cracking. 


the 
mal protest to Italy, steps would 





Photo-offset reproduction of typescript 
reduced 50% by photo-offset, then re- 
duced 16 diameters by photography and 
enlarged back 32 diameters. 


Photo-offset reproduction of 
newsprint reduced 50% by photo- 
offset, then reduced 16 dian- 
eters by photography and en- 
larged back 32 diameters. 


Another disclosure was that the 
forty-Cive pouad forward apchér of 
the Penguin had been severed from 
ite haweer with a eharp kuife and 
Inspector King admitted it was poe 
sible that {m that fact might He the 
eaplanation of why the missing 
man's body has not been found If 
Colltags, en expert swimmer hed 
been tied to a length of rope made 
fast to the anehor ia the sisllow 
we'er of the cove fe might have heen 
able to keep afloat for a time only 
to elm at last from exhaustion. 

Dtetriet Attorsey Edwardes, diesat- 
lofie@ with the resuita of eearching 
the surface of the waters of the 


STOCK....the same as 
printing except that we 
eled paper having a he 
the other hand, we can 
and wash drawings in h 
and other rough finis 
easily without cracking 





This page was photographed with a Leica Camera, at the Huntington 
Library, San Marino,California, under the supervision of 
Dr.L.Bendikson, by E.F.Morkisch, 








oe ie pele it a 


veer 














® ; ye a "a: babi 
. : " ' i Qht4 6 @ is ~ i ; 
i wiih: Se atm mae Be " 
& ; ; La ot: ; 
8 i (WhO [iy ale awe 








4 Ay opti a yny, ie aeey, 
wget tot Wal mee wt 
; he ee iat Phe) a 
| | smi tite OS aA 
r ~~ i ot 2 amenel aan nines r ai 


{ ay 





































19 


4 ve i 
sory, teenie 3 
ay ee 
wah Yarvir biel 
& = anh oe 

ee La a 
. rn 
, ; = iPor " 
a 
'Ai nM eer ihe 
e +@e@ visemes aha ae . a 
eels: o% ; a . a 

aT we : rh 

Mo a. 


f ty edt s 


; ; va =» > sg 


2". wb demel ah 


ms +5 uset eee 


7 oo »copeu tb 
A ete nmry 'ne '4 
© we tae i ae - 
i F A a bet 
. ns ioe 'each * 
; j 


et ~ any ad » 
> 7 


as 
7 
0 


a7 


j 
i. (ead haan 
ce a ait ae? 


> a 


: | Wr Setey see re 
a reread okey 1 i 
; (74m 7 PY ' ' seed 'a 
+4 once hie 
soe - _ At Zz 
% | so > ate ee fp 'ae | 
/ wees Otel! 6gi4e rea 
art be we de ae tt oil : 
e24 Sud Vide » 'site 
<q ie | Hale Coat 
ve 6) View Pet bee) ete 
en 
eal 1 seal ale Pd, ian se 
i * te Oo pee eee 
' : che one : ae ra 
'i bs eho Hae ek M9 


4 ale hgh beatae a 
v 'pas —. ee | ae o% os 


' ; dale' | iP hie 
nit a sata veneers 


i : 
rd es : os Ke Pi or 


Ly 


iv ho La - 


FIGURE LXIIc 


STOCK....the same as 


Iapemioe ned [easenccat Teal pad inti t that 
eperter was poo printing excep we 
ie fr oe eled papers having a he 
man's body tee ot I. the other hand, we can 
Sosa tied tala seaenatfaclopet ces and wash drawings in h 
Sera vee tactonca halaaiad hore keee and other rough finis 
adie to beep aficet fer a time, caly easily without cracking 
te otk ot lect rem euhausties. 


Newsprint and typescript reduced a net thirty-two diame- 
ters from original size and enlarged back sixteen diame-— 
ters, by Dr. Bendikson with Leica equipment. 


Newsprint reduced a net thirty-two diameters from original 
size and enlarged back sixteen diameters. Reductions by 
Recordak Corporation, and enlargements by amateur photogra- 
pher. 


oer © &@ wwe e 
ss 

c@ as + == 
amr wees watwes 
oo awe oe toe ow 
e 


Newsprint reduced a net thirty-two diameters from original 
Size and enlarged back sixteen diameters, by Folmer Graflex 
Corporation with its recording camera. 


there would be 8 "hus and ery" for 

"easy money' Jo the peat compaige 
| as © means of casing (he let of the 
| farmer. whe ls beavily In debt Mr 
Hoover. secerding to Mr Hearst 
doubled inst euch 6 demand would 
be wate 


Mi Hearst said (nat as lacrosse 





Newsprint reduced a net sixteen diameters from original 
Size and enlarged back eight diameters, by Folmer Graflex 
Corporation with its recording camera. 








Nn Vee SS eee 


FIGURE LxXiila 








full-Tone Collotype Reproduction of a Contact Print 
Sr euie Daeron Film, Showing its Exact. Size. 


cours hausse cinquanic-six demandés, fabrica- 
lion avagce, Lebaudy achéte peu, chez nous 
mémes achetears. — Delgrange. Ce Say. 
raffineur, cours ¢i te-six 

ieurs hullande pe eracioes ree Fraser ot Lebaa 







fabrication lebaudy a ' 

chez eee ile, yer 95, — ei 
. ussignys, luasignic 
eee ta fennrs, 

wedinic b barter gucthary , Montcerne écn- 
vent. — Wallon. | Dibos, 22, cambaceres. Auguste, 
arthur, julie, enfants, wiesbeden. albert at-valéry, 
berdie dleps. avons envoyé depeche bonge ste- 
ee — Amélie. | Loustan, 162, faubourg st- 
martin. tovggbien. édouard earbeme, léon parti, 
sonee: bs nouvelles, tres-inquitte. — *veuve Du- 

y. 





Pour cyie conforwe 











, DIRECTION. BEMERALE 
: | o€4 TELEGRAPUES o ore POSTES 


DEPECKES pan F Pan PICEONS 


% 


Full-Tone Collotype Reproduction of a Thirty-two 


Diameter Enlargement of a Part of One of the Sections 
of the Dagron Film, Showing Legibility Despite High 
Original Reduction Ratio. 





COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 





original text in the case of these clip-— 
pings is double that of the reduction in 
the clippings on Figure LXIIb. They have 
not been enlarged back to the original 
size of the texts from which they were 
drawn, but remain in a half-size reproduc-— 
tion. In most cases, the eight stages of 
transmission through which they have 
passed have obliterated all legible quali- 
ties. 

The following clippings are repro- 
duced as Figure LXIIc. 
1. Clipping reduced a net 32 diameters 
from original and enlarged back 16 di- 
ameters, to 50% of its original size, 
by Dr. Bendikson with Leica equipment. 
Clipping reduced in the same amount and 
enlarged back in the same way with 
Recordak camera and amateur enlargement 
photography. 
Clipping reduced a net 32 diameters from 
original and enlarged back 16 diameters, 
to 50% of original size, by Folmer 
Graflex Corporation. 
Clipping reduced a net 16 diameters from 
original and enlarged back 8 diameters, 
to 50% of original size, by the Folmer 
Graflex Corporation with its recording 
camera. 


One of the most extraordinary uses 
of microcopying, and seemingly one of the 
most efficient in the history of photog-— 
raphy, was the work of Monsieur Dagron dur- 
ing the siege of Paris in 1870. Dagron's 
postal service into the beleagured city 
was set up to use carrier pigeons. To in- 
crease the number of words a pigeon could 
carry, messages were printed on a large 
sheet of paper and microphotographed on 
film. The film was then inserted in a 
quill and carried by the pigeon. A piece 
Otsu incane mambo: the handsisot. Dire 
Bendikson of the Huntington Library. The 
fragment printed herewith is an enlarge- 
ment of S52 diameters from the film. The 
exact size of the film, which contains 
eleven pages of three columns each, is al- 
so shown. There is no direct evidence to 
establish the size of the print from which 
the microphotograph was made, but by count- 
ing the letters in a line, and the number 
Qumcolumms per inch, it is possible to es— 
timate that the vertical dimensions of the 
original typography must have been about 








125 


the same as modern newsprint, and the hor- 
izontal dimension somewhat smaller. The 
reduction from which this enlargement was 
made must have been the equivalent of some- 
thing between 32 and 39 diameters from 
newsprint. 


Cost of Photosensitive Surface 

The cost of the photographic sur- 
face used in microcopying varies between 
#.14 and $.50 per square foot. The cheap- 
est film is the motion picture nitrate 
film which sells for $.01 a rumning foot, 
45mm. wide; but this is, or ought to be, 
excluded from consideration. No nitrate 
film should ever be used for copying work, 
for the cellulose nitrate upon which the 
emulsion is spread is highly unstable in 
the presence of heat. In its chemical com- 
position it is a half-finished high explo- 
Sive, like a dynamite stopped halfway in 
the course of manufacture. It cannot be 
preserved with safety except in expensive 
vaults and it always brings a fire risk 
Wiley aee tb). 

The so-called "safety film" or 
cellulose acetate has a fire resistance 
about the same as that. of paper of similar 
density. Hold a match to a sheet of dry 
cellulose acetate and it will crumble but 
iG will not sustain a flame. Tt has high 
stability-—-Mr. B. W. Scribner of the Bu- 
reau of Standards has stated--equal to the 
best-made papers. Safety film is sold or- 
dinarily at $.015 a running foot in the 
65mm. width. It can sometimes be pur- 
chased from firms dealing in odd lengths 
for a lower price, but the $.015 is stand- 
ard, whether for perforated or unperforated 
tidm. lf chee rilmeis = perrorated onmsbo tin 
sides, one inch is usable between the per- 
forations; this figures out at $.18 per 
square foot of usable photographic surface; 
if the film is perforated on one side only, 
1 1/8" out of the 35mm. are usable, and 
this makes the usable surface cost $.1605 
per square foot. For unperforated film, 
with 1 1/4" usable, the price per square 
foot comes to #.144. 

The 1émm. film, perforated on one 
side only, is) seldyfor #.0075°>a foot; the 
usable width is .43" to .5"; therefore the 
price of a usable square foot (28 linear 
feet).is ¢.21 at the highest, or $.18 at 
the lowest. The 7Omm. film, perforated on 
both sides, is supplied on special order 





126 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS | 





at $.035 a running foot, or $.185 per 
square foot. 

A slightly different emulsion with 
a different weight of supporting film is 
manufactured for use in photoengraving 
work and sold by a different method. Be- 
cause of these differences, the process 
film cut in rectangles is sold at a higher 
price. A dozen sheets, 5" x 7", retail 
for $1.45 list price. Disecowmts in the 
trade will reduce this in large quantity 
orders, so that the photographic surface 
in this form costs $.50 per square foot in 
small quantities, $.325 per square foot in 
large quantities. The same emulsion on 
glass is sold for the same price in the 
same size. 

The tabulation of these figures 
indicates the price range of translucent 
photographic surfaces, whether in the form 
of film or glass, of rectangles or long 
strips: 





Film or Glass Versus Paper 
Why is it desirable to use a trans-— 


lucent medium in copying? One part of the 
answer to this question is found in the be- 
havior of light. In discussing the possi- 
bilities of reading reduced-size print by 
means of a reading glass, it was stated 
that a "direct" optical system can be used 
in raising the ostensible size of the let- 
ters one diameter, but that it soor. comes 
to call for more intensive light on the 
surface of the paper than would be required 
if no magnifying were done. The same prin- 
ciple, pressed one degree further, will 
permit a legible image of a page to be pro- 
jected from a paper copy by reflection in 

a projection lantern if sufficient light 

is focused on the paper. As the enlarging 
ratio increases, it approaches and reaches 
the point where the surface of the paper 
will not reflect sufficient light to make 
the projected image legible. At this 


TABLE XXXIX 


PRICE PER 


SQUARE FOOT OF USABLE SURFACE 





55mm. moving picture film, perforated both sides ...sece./$ e185 
oom. Moving pilchure film perhonated sone Sde) mar.) <lelereele ue 
Souls wlonalials, joil(eimbuasy sealibul, qiayolssetiopethaseh sagncmadcoacdcou0 od 144 
6mm. moving picture film, perforated. one side ws. .v.ces ~18-.21 
70mm. moving picture film, perforated both sides ......e.. eos 
Bitcxo7l process viiimcor class (larger lotsies. mee ate ae cee eOeD 

5 x7" process filmsortglass (eamall dots)... sss cess «50 


A strip of the 16mm. and a strip 
of 35mm. film are shown in the accompany— 
ing sheets. 

These figures for translucent sur- 
face are to be compared with those for 
photostat or bromide paper. Insurance bro- 
mide paper sells for $3.60 per gross cut 
8" x 10", or $.045 per square foot. The 
same price, or in some cases $.005 more or 
less, buys most kinds of photostat paper. 
The difference between $.045 and the pric-— 
es listed above is paid for the purpose of 
having the photographic image on a translu- 
cent medium. Translucency costs from $.10 
to $.28 a square foot.® 





3. Paper in 70mm. strips sells for twice the price of ordinary photostat rolls, but a simple frame with 
a razor blade set in it, will cut the paper in these strips, making the low price available. 


point the translucent medium becomes use~ 

ful, for light sufficient to render legible 

a projected image of a reduction up to £5 
diameters (and perhaps beyond that) can be 
forced through the film or the glass. The 
additional cost of the translucent photo- 
graphic medium must justify itself by the 
increased utilization of light in the pro- 
jection process, which renders possible 
the greater reduction ratios that are | 
standard in microcopying. 


Film Strips or Rec- 


Film, Glass or Paper? 


tangles? 
The basic comparison of the three 


nena i ie ae allt 


IES USE OLSi6eMM> FILM IN LIBRARY WORK 


In the past year, considerable progress has been made in equipment and 
technique for copying various records on film. The technique of micro-copying, 
combined with the use of WPA labor, opens a new field for achievement of large- 


scale objectives, hitherto abandoned as too expensive for the average institution. 


The Recordak Corporation, of 350 Madison Avenue, New York City, 
using regular commercial equipment and specially developed equipment has done 
considerable work along this line. Sometime ago, Recordak equipment was used 
to photograph the NRA and AAA hearings in Washington on 16mm. film. Posi- 


tive copies of this film record were sold to libraries throughout the country. 


Recently, Dr. T. R. Schellenberg and others, with the cooperation of the 
Recordak Corporation, worked out a plan for the photographing of library cards. 
The general procedure as planned involves the filming of the catalogues of all the 
libraries in a region, and the typing of library cards from the film copies to make a 
master catalogue. For the reading of the film, the typists use Recordak projectors, 


which enlarge the film copies to original size. 


For $5.50 worth of film (200 feet), including developing, 10,000 library 
catalogue cards can be copied. The plan is ideal, as cards can be photographed at 
a high rate of speed with absolute accuracy, minimum disturbance of library 
routine, simplicity of operation, and at a lower cost than could possibly be 
attained with any other method. Two large centers, Cleveland and Philadelphia, 


are pioneering in this field by making union catalogues of their library holdings. 


The attached film contains pictures of a number of standard library cards. 














PRESERVATION OF NEWSPAPERS 
BY PHOTOGRAPHY 


(Reprinted, by permission, from 
Bulletin of American Newspaper 


Publishers Association) 


By W. E. WINES, 
Manager Mechanical Department 


A photographic method and apparatus for reproducing newspaper pages 
in reduced size, so that newspaper files may consist of small reels of negative film 
instead of bulky bound volumes, has been announced by Eastman Kodak Company 
and was exhibited in New York by Charles Z. Case. This is a development of the 
Recordak system which has been in use for eight years by banks and mercantile 
companies for making photographic records of checks and bills. The process 
consists of two steps or stages. The pages of any issue are first photographed con- 
secutively on a sensitized film 13 inches wide, by means of a special camera which 
photographs the pages with great rapidity—approximately 30 pages a minute. For 
viewing the film, a special projector or viewing apparatus has been devised which 
produces an image the linear dimensions of which are 14 times those of the 
original printed page. A column 2 inches wide is enlarged by the projector to 
3 inches and the height of the letters is magnified in the same ratio. 


THE FILM. 


The film used is similar to the standard 35-mm. film used in professional 
moving picture cameras but differs in two important particulars. The first is 
that the base which carries the sensitive emulsion is the non-inflammable cellulose 
acetate, used in amateur movie cameras, instead of the highly combustible cellulose 
nitrate, commonly used for professional moving picture work. Mr. Case says that 
the National Board of Fire Underwriters rates this "safety" film as offering no 
more fire hazard than the same quantity and form of newsprint. The second 


697 


RECORDAK CORPORATION 


SUBSIDIARY OF EASTMAN KODAK COMPANY 
350 MADISON AVENUE 
NEW YORK 


Briefly stated, the outstanding advantages 
of this method are: 


A tremendous reduction in space required to 
house newspaper files. The film record requires 
less than 2% of the storage space required by 
the original bound volumes. 


The film record is a much more permanent one 
than the present bound volumes. This record 
can be renewed as deSired thus preserving the 
files indefinitely. 


The files can be referred to much more easily 
with the new method. They can be retained 
where they are immediately available and the 
moving about of large bound volumes is 
eliminated. 


The cost is exceedingly small = being only 
1-1/5¢ per page for standard size newspaper 
pages. Consequently 1,000 pages will cost 
only $12.00 which is little more than the 
present binding cost. 


RECORDAK CORPORATION 








difference is that this film is perforated on only one edge, thus allowing more 
usable area on the same total width. One foot of film negative carries eight and 
a fraction newspaper pages or approximately 825 to 850 pages on 100 feet of 
film. The pages are arranged lengthwise on the film. 


THE CAMERA. 


The camera, which might more properly be called a photographing machine, 
is almost wholly automatic in action. The newspapers to be photographed are 
fed in one page at a time, very much as sheets are fed into a cylinder press or 
mimeograph. Since the photographing of an entire month's edition will require 
only thirty minutes, more or less, it would hardly pay any newspaper to purchase 
one of these cameras. Newspaper publishers ship the month's file of newspapers to 
Rochester each month and pay for the negative film at a price of 10 cents per foot. 
If more than one film is desired from the same lot of papers, duplicates are made 
at a cost of 5 cents per foot. These prices cover the film itself as well as the items 
of exposure and development. This charge for the first negative is equivalent to 
11/4, cents per page, and for the positive duplicate copies, 7, of a cent per page. 

A reel of one hundred feet of film occupies a storage space 159x334x334 
inches and carries at least 850 newspaper pages. When asked concerning the life 
of the film, Mr. Case replied that no one really knows how long a negative film 
will last, as none has yet become useless from age. It may last 100 years or 
more. As it is a comparatively simple and inexpensive matter to duplicate the film 
at any time, the length of life of film is not really a vital matter. Mr. Case also 
stated that bound volumes of old issues can be reproduced and preserved by this 
method, but that to do so it would be necessary to take the volumes apart. 


THE PROJECTOR. 


The projector or viewing device is shown in the accompanying illustration. 
The base measures approximately 15 by 18 inches, and the total height is a 
little over 3 feet. The reel of film is mounted on a carrier on top of the apparatus, 
as shown, and is unwound and rewound as desired by means of a crank mounted 
on the right side of the casing, as is shown in the illustration. Since the pages are 
atranged in consecutive order on the film, any page desired may be easily and 
quickly located. The projector shows both 16 and 35 mm. film, 


In the base of the projector is a roll of dull surfaced paper 15 inches wide. 
The free end of this roll is pulled over the base and forms the screen upon which 
the film pictures are projected. As the surface becomes soiled a clean section is 
pulled down and the soiled portion is torn off. The screen shows one-quarter of 
a newspaper page at a time. 

It will be noticed from the illustration that four columns of an 8-column 
page are visible. The knob and lever mounted on the left side of the case are 
employed for shifting the film, carrier and optical system forward or backward or 
to right or left so as to bring into the field of view the exact portion of the page 
which the operator desires to read. Records photographed on 16 mm. film appear 
in their entirety on the screen. The source of light is a 200-watt lamp protected 
by a guard as shown. The apparatus is designed to prevent injury to the film by 
heat, no matter how long the film may be exposed to the light of the lamp. The 
cabinet protects the image on the screen from interference by extraneous light 
sources, thus allowing the projector to be used in any room under normal lighting 
conditions. 


If a copy of any particular article or story is desired, this can be obtained 
photographically by laying a piece of photographic paper on the screen so that 
the sensitized surface receives the image. If a print of a whole page is desired, 
this may be made from the negative by the process commonly employed for making 
enlarged photographic prints. The price of the projector is $185.00. 

Newspapers in various parts of the country are now photographing their 
editions by the Recordak method and are using Recordak Library Projectors for 
reading the film. Several libraries are now using film copies of newspapers that 
they ordinarily kept on their shelves in bound form. The use of film copies 
materially reduces the space required to house the bound volumes, eliminates the 


698 


cost of binding and provides a permanent record. These libraries are using 
Recordak Library Projectors for reading from the films. 


Recently the Recordak Corporation photographed the editions of the New 
York Times from January 1, 1914, to December 31, 1918. Positive copies of this 
New York Times film for the 5 years of the World War have been ordered by a 
number of libraries. The cost of the film copies for the entire 5 years is $433.74. 
Individual years may be purchased if desired. 


(This reprint contains revised prices and descriptions of equipment.) 


(For additional information, address Recordak Corporation, Subsidiary 
of Eastman Kodak Company, 350 Madison Avenue, New York, N. Y.) 


ENTEN 


1° OF THE LIN 
men es 


< . 





THE PROJECTOR 
699 


cet 





| 

) 
' 
} 
f 
' 





COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


possible reduced-scale copying methods 
from the standpoint of costs of surface 
can be established if we consider the cost 
of copying 256 square feet of printed mat- 
ter (the equivalent of 93. pages of the 
New York Times, or of an octavo book of 
approximately 300 pages). It is evident 
that this amount of printed matter can be 
copied at different reduction ratios on 
areas of photographic surface at the fol- 
lowing costs: 


127 


Reading apparatus for paper in re- 
ductions of 6 to 8 diameters has not 
been developed as far as that for film in 
reductions of 16 diameters; there is no 
reading apparatus at all for glass, and 
reading machines for film positives made 
from rectangular glass plates with multiple 
exposures have not yet been brought to per- 
fection in design. Storage and filing of 
paper in short items may prove less costly 
than storage and filing of film; glass 


TABLE XL 


COMPARATIVE PRICES OF PHOTOGRAPHIC SURFACE ON PAPER, GLASS, AND FILM; 


WITH REDUCTION RATIOS TO BRING PRICES TO COMMON LEVELS. 


FIGURES FOR 


£56 SQUARE FEET OF PAGES REDUCED PHOTOGRAPHICALLY BY THE FOLLOWING RE- 
DUCTION RATIOS 








Price of 5" x 7" glass 
Price of 35mm. film, 
perforated one side 
Price of photostat 
paper 









It is worth noting that the lower 
threshold for reading glass legibility, 
set in the preceding chapter at 7 di- 
ameters reduction from typescript, would 
permit the copying of this 256 square feet 
of paper on 5.2 square feet of photo- 
graphic surface, the price of which would 
be $.23. If the photostatic reduction on 
paper were to be four diameters, the price 
of the paper would be $.72; a reduction of 
two diameters (i.e., to one-half normal 
size) would require photostat paper cost- 
ing $2.88. 

These figures indicate a very in- 
teresting problem in planning the use of 
photography in scholarship. The zone 
from 6 to 8% diameters of reduction on 
paper corresponds in materials cost to 
the zone of 11 to 16 diameters on film, 
16 to 22% diameters on glass. Process- 
ing costs under present conditions prob- 
ably give additional advantages to the 
film strips in the case of a long series 
of pages that will fill 100 feet or more 
of film, but this advantage in favor of 
film may be reversed in the case of short 
items, especially when a number of posi- 
tive copies are required. 








ee sae 






would probably cause higher storage costs, 
but would have possible advantages in dur- 
ability. The fundamental choice between 
the long strip and the rectangle, between 
paper, film and glass, between the low re- 
duction ratios required by paper and the 
high ratios permitted by glass are not con- 
clusively indicated by the present state of 
technology and experiment. But precisely 
because the use of moving picture film has 
been more highly developed as a quantity 
industry, Jt) is to vmis medium that mostvos 
the experiment and development has been di- 
rected, and consequently it is in terms of 
the use of this medium that the whole prob-— 
lem of microcopying can be best presented 
at this time. 

For that reason the analysis of the 
possibilities of microcopying on the fol- 
lowing pages will assume standard moving 
picture film in the standard widths of 16mn., 
S55mm., and 70mm. as the norm, and treat pa- 
per and glass or rectangular film as pos— 
sible exceptions. 

The Simplified Practice Division of 
the Department of Commerce has asked for an 
agreement by all those promoting microcopy-— 
ing to adapt all apparatus to the 16mm. and 


L283 


45mm. widths. In replying to the Division 
of Simplified Practise recommendation, cir- 
culated in September 1945, the writer, as 
chairman of the Joint Committee on Materi- 
als for Research, made the reservation 
that simplified practice should not ex- 
eludevat this time a size VoL. films thar 
will permit of vertical filing, and coér- 
dinate with the use of paper and glass. 
But for the copying of a long fixed series 
of material, it seemed best to concur in 
this standardization of film width. A 
"long fixed series" is any amount of doc- 
umentation that will require 100 feet or 
more of film for copying, and will not 
call for the insertion of a newly photo- 
graphed item between two items already 
photographed. 


Full Use of Area of Moving Picture Film 
When 16mm., 35mm., or 7Omm. film 
is used for microcopying, one dimension of 
the photographic image is rigidly fixed; 
it cannot exceed the usable width of the 
film, nor can it be less than the width of 
the film without causing a wastage of 
photosensitive surface. The dimension 
along the length of the film is variable 
provided the photographing is done in a 
camera, such as the Filmograph or Recordak, 
which permits the operator to vary the 
amount of film used at each exposure. 
the crosswise dimension is fixed, and 
therefore, attention must be given to the 
placing of the photographic image on the 
film. The same principle of maximum use 
of area that was found operative in photo- 
offset work is applicable to microphotog-— 
raphy JUSteas Ets wastelul™ vOuprinine 
Ole xa GUN DookwOon wane aL xa 7 Sphoro=olesies 





But 


First Position 
6 diameters reduction 
of 6" x 9! book 









OHoa0gon9gg goon gn n7o0000n0nV 90000 9007007 97OV oO oF0700F0O0O0000000 








Second Position 
9 diameters reduction 
of 6% x 9" book 


OooonpnNoNoFoonMo0nnO on o0n oOo noon nono onnAFoOoOnoAoAoOooo0nnADo 





METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


metal sheet, so it is wasteful to make on 
35mm. film an image only 3/4" wide. 

There are three, or possibly four 
positions in which book pages may be copied 
on moving picture film. The position 
chosen for photographing a book on the full 
width of the film determines the reduction 
ratio. The three positions, hereafter 
called first, second and third, are illus-— 
trated on the following diagram. 

The relation of these book posi- 
tions to the reduction ratios can be illus-— 
trated by calculating the reduction ratio 
of a book 6" x 9" in all three positions 
on the two kinds of film, 55mm. and 16mm. 
The corresponding variation in cost of 
photosensitive surface can be illustrated 
by calculating the footage and price of 
film necessary to copy 100 pages in each of 
the positions and on each of the widths of 
itt lorries 

Verneur Pratt, president of the In— 
ternational Filmbook Corporation, has pro- 
posed that the reading material might be 
arranged in a fourth way-—-the lines of 
print running across the film, making a 
column the full length of the film but 
leaving space on the film for more than 
one column. 

If Mr. Pratt's plan for multiple 
exposures on strips should be applied to 
70mm. film, from Sto le "colimsromon. 
dinary book pages reduced 16 to 20 diame— 
ters could be run on the width of the film. 
There is at present no apparatus for mak-— 
ing photographs in this way, but the price | 
of film for 100 pages can none the less be d 
calculated. A hundred pages would go on f 
4% to 9 linear inches of film, the 
price of which would be $.015 to $.0275. 


Third Position 
12 diameters reduction é 
of 6" x 939i book 





COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 129 


TABLE XLI 


FILM FOOTAGES REQUIRED IN COPYING BOOKS IN DIFFERENT POSITIONS ON 35mm. 
FILM (PERFORATED ON BOTH SIDES) AND 16mm. FILM, USING FULL WIDTH OF FILM 










Reduction Ratio to use 
Full Width of Film 





Film Position 







55mm. 
55mm. 
65mm. 


iabeche 
Second 
Third 


diameters 
9 diameters 
diameters 







16mm. | First 12 to 14 diameters* 
16mm. | Second LOmLON DI aGlane ters 
16mm. | Third 24 to 28 diameters 


Feet 







6 1/4 or 5 5/12 or 75 or 65 
2 3/4 or 2 5/12 or 33 or 29 
Li etor ete /3 16 














Film Footages for 100 
Pages of Book 


Price of 
Film 












Inches 





Tea 2 or Lays eS aS 
5 1/2 or 66 - 0825 
oe 6 or 38 0475 


















047, Orme Ose 
SOS IOrme OS 
OM OTe Oil 





*The variation in 16mm. film turns on the width of usable surface, whether .5" or ,43", 


Processing Costs 

The processing costs for micro-— 
copies are like the costs of the photo- 
graphic surface in that they apply to a 
footage of film strips, or, roughly, an 
area of film. 

There are two kinds of processing 
involved in microcopying: first, the de—- 
veloping and fixing of the negative; and 
second, the making of contact or other 
prints from the negative. If a unique 
copy only of a book or document is desired, 
there is no need for the second process— 
ing. 

The commercial processing of film 
has been organized in two kinds of busi- 
ness enterprise. Short strips of film are 
processed for the amateur photographer by 
services available in every drug store. 
Long runs of moving picture film are proc-— 
essed at prices that may be much less per 


film area than those charged by the ordi- 
nary service. 

The short five-foot strips of film 
used in such cameras as the Leica and Con- 
tax can usually be developed (but not 
printed as positive contact prints) at the 
corner drug store. The charge is usually 
#.15 or $.20--hence $.035 or $.04 a foot. 
One New York specialist in developing the 
five-foot rolls charges $.30 or $.06 a 
foot. Many users of these small micro- 
copying cameras do their own processing. 

Film strips of 100 feet or more in 
length can be processed in the film labor- 
atories serving the moving picture industry. 
Quotations from a number of laboratories, 
analyzed to make allowance for various 
special charges connected with sound track 
printing, establish the following scale: 


~~ —  — 


TABLE XLII 


PRICES OF FILM PROCESSING 








Including Film 


Processing Alone 





For developing 35mm. filn, 
For making a 435mm. 
For developing 16mm. filn, 
For making a 16mm. contact 
For reducing a 35mm. negative to a 16mm. 


per foot 


positive, price inclusive of cost of 16mm. 


film, per footage of 35mm. film 


eoeee 


DiCEMTO Ollmeere ener. 
contact print, per foot 


eooeceeeeveee 

















Dal /2éetouo jee 
Cah Pé-ctons" Lie 
2 1/4¢ to 5¢ 


1 1/4¢ to 2e¢ 


130 METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


The variation in prices is not on- | (not including price of the film) is fig- 
ly a difference that appears from firm to ured at $.04 per foot. 
firm, but also responds to differences in In estimating processing costs of 
footage, and in number of prints to be the long rolls of film, accownt must be 
taken from the same negative. The minimum | taken of the possibility that this work 
prices appear at 10,000 feet of film where | may be done by the individual or institu- 
this is the basis of the differential, or tion which does the photographing. The 


at five prints from the same negative large, continuous process machines used in 
where the differential is based on number the moving picture industry would not be 
OIA Sie practicable for such work, but a Stineman 
The Recordak Corporation operates developing reel, taking 100 feet of filn, 
on a somewhat different basis; it sells can be purchased for $32.00; the chemicals 
the film and processing as one unit and for developing 100 feet of 35mm. film cost 


throws in a metal reel and pasteboard box about $.10. Automatic printing machinery 
container to boot. The price of 200 feet for the 100-foot film strips is also avail- 
of 16mm. film is $5.50, which includes the | able, and is not too bulky to be part of 
processing. The film is not the ordinary the equipment of a photographic department 
positive emulsion, and is not available of a library. 

without the processing. But if it were Processing costs, like reduction 
quotable at $.0075 a foot, the processing ratios, introduce a very significant vari- 
and servicing elements in the price would able into microcopying. The lower priced 


stand at $.0188 a foot. This price in- processing may or may not be inferior to 
cludes not only special processing for con—| the more costly. The effect upon costs is 
trast and permanence, but also servicing illustrated by taking the figures on film 
LMecherCul cane OL ShOrGeS trips |OissieLmn. footage required for 100 pages of a 6" x 
packaging, and mailing. 9" book, as given above, and figuring in 
The Recordak Corporation also of-— with them the high and low processing costs. 
fers for sale 35mm. prints of certain news— | Note that high processing costs can make it 
paper files. The file for the New York more expensive to copy at the reduction ra-— 
Times has been microcopied for the years tio of 21 diameters on 16mm. film than to 
1914-1918 inclusive—-a total of almost copy with lot processing costs at a reduc— 


90,000 pages; the set of films is on sale tion of 12 diameters on 35mm. film. The 
for $.66 per 100 pages. Figures presented | gains in cost of materials that may be 

by the Recordak Corporation during the made by increasing the reduction ratio may 
planning of this project indicated that conceivably be frittered away if the high 
that part of the cost which is represented | reduction ratio renders necessary a more 
by the printing off of the positive copies | expensive processing. On the other hand, 


TABLE XLIII 


EFFECT OF VARIATION IN PROCESSING COSTS ON PRICE OF MICROCOPY POSITIVE 
OF A BOOK OF 100 PAGES, 6" x 9", IN VARYING REDUCTION RATIOS 
(16mm. film calculated at .43" width of usable surface) 










Price of Film and Processing 
Low (2 1/2¢ for 35mm. $.025 High 
£1/4¢ for lémm. .0225 $.05 






Reduction Ratio Footage of Film 






















35mm. 150 inches $.3125 $.625 
35mm. 66 inches 18754 -5025¢ 
35mm. 38 inches -08¢ .16¢ 














16mm. 65 inches 
16mm. 29 inches 
16 inches 


-50¢ 





















COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


resort to low processing costs may entail 

a low reduction ratio, and hence the sav- 

ing in processing may be sacrificed by in- 
creasing the material cost. 

Just as in calculating typescript 
book costs it was necessary to assume ar-— 
bitrarily an average typing charge before 
proceeding to further comparative studies, 
so in calculating microcopying costs an ar-— 
bitrary average processing figure will be 
assumed. The difference between the price 
of developing a negative and the price of 
making a positive print from a negative 
will be ignored; it does not appear in 
most quotations. Processing will be fig- 
ured regularly at $.0175 for 16mm., $.025 
for 35mm. film; the joint cost of film and 
processing will stand then at $.025 for 
1é6mm., $.04 for 35mm. film. It is under- 
stood that these prices are available only 
in large footages, running into the thou- 
sands of feet. Maximum figures for short-— 
er runs, when necessary, will be assumed 
at $.03 for 16mm. film, $.05 for 35mm., to 
include film and processing. Very short 
runs of a few inches only introduce a spe- 
cial problem which will be separately anal- 
yzed. 


First Costs and Running Costs in Micro- 
copying 

The application of microcopying to 
the distribution of reading matter is so 
new, the price levels at which it operates 
so revolutionary, that the fundamental ele- 
ments of cost as they appear in publishing 
are not apparent at first glance, and yet 
they are present. In micr>copying, as in 
other techniques, there is the antithesis 
between a cost curve that falls with each 
additional number of copies and a cost 
curve that remains constant regardless of 
the number of copies that are made. In 
other words, there is a first cost and a 
running cost. The first cost includes the 
labor of making a photograph and processing 
the negative film; the running cost is the 
cost of making each additional positive 
from the negative. 

There may arise many situations in 
which there will be no positives made from 
the negative. The original negative will 
be made as a unique copy for a single pur- 
chaser. The cost of this unique copy will 
consist of two elements: first, labor in 
photography; second, film and processing. 





16k 


This situation will be studied first, and 
then its implications traced in those cases 
where a number of positive copies are to be 
made from a single negative for a number of 
purchasers. The cost of making this nega- 
tive stands, however, as a "first cost," 
comparable, for instance, with the cost of 
setting type and fitting it in a press, or 
preparing mimeograph stencils or photo- 
offset metal sheets. It is absolutely in- 
dependent of the number of copies that are 
to be made from the negative. 

How is this cost to be estimated in 
the case of long runs of material? As in 
so many other situations, the most expen- 
sive and specialized apparatus reduces the 
labor cost. The small, non-specialized 
cameras such as the Leica or Contax corre- 
spond to hand-set type in printing, and the 
large, highly-specialized cameras, such as 
the Recordak, Filmograph, Kennedy, and per-— 
haps the new Graflex, correspond to the 
linotype in efficiency. 

Experience in photographing large 
collections of documents has been most amp-— 
ly obtained by the Filmograph Corporation 
and by Lloyd B. Kennedy in copying land ti- 
tle abstract records, and by the Recordak 
Corporation in a variety of copying enter- 
prises. 

Filmograph and Kennedy experiences 
agree in establishing that one operator can 
copy 10,000 pages of bound records per day; 
Dr. T. R. Schellenberg, using a Recordak to 
copy the unbound typescript pages of the 
NRA and AAA hearings, also copied 10,000 
pages a day. In all these cases there was 
material in hundreds of thousands of pages, 
uniform in size, continuous in supply. The 
May Company of Cleveland uses a Recordak to 
copy its internal records. The operators 
photograph 20,000 statements, 7" x 10", per 
day. Speed records with the new Recordak 
bound book copying camera are not available. 
It is safe to conclude that experience with 
uniform and continuous matter, whether 
bound or unbound, permits an estimate of 
10,000 pages a day as a maximum. 

While these automatic machines can 
be operated by relatively unskilled labor, 
Lue Seno vOONmMUCh mE >DONcCOUMGm Lic labor Cost 
at $10.00 per day, which might cover the 
wages of two operators, one to do the pho- 
tographing, the other to bring the material 
to the machine and return it to place. 

This labor cost is independent of 


qe 





the reduction ratio and hence of the amount 
of film used in a given copying job. But 
with the film used at a reduction ratio of 
16 to 23 diameters, and processing costs 
figured at their average for long runs, the 
cost of film and processing should stand 
somewhere near the labor cost—-perhaps 
$10.00 worth of labor will photograph 
$12.00 to $15.00 worth of film (including 
processing). At this rate the first cost 
--i.e., the finished negative—-of micro-— 
copied material in large runs can be made 
for $.22 to $.25 per 100 pages. This is 
the cost at which a unique copy of a great 
body of material could be made for a single 
purchaser. 

But if a number of purchasers 
should wish to acquire the same material, 
the cost of making the positive copies for 
each would be exactly the film—and-process-— 
ing charge for film plus a pro-rata frac- 
tion of the first cost divided among the 
purchasers. The behavior of costs in this 
situation can be illustrated from two cas-— 
es: first, the actual experience of the 
Joint Committee on Materials for Research 
in distributing microcopies of the hearings 
held under the NRA and AAA; and second, the 
estimated costs of a project for copying 
two million pages of books printed in Eng- 
land before 1640--a project that would 
bring to subscribing libraries copies of 
all books listed in Pollard and Redgrave 
Short Title Catalogue. 

The Joint Committee arranged with 
the Agricultural Adjustment Administration 
and the National Recovery Administration to 
make microcopies of the hearings. The to- 
tal number of typescript pages was approxi- 
mately 315,000. The reduction ratio was 
25 diameters. The cost of making the neg— 
ative, including Recordak rental, film and 
film developing was $455.00 for 13,400 feet 
of 16mm. film. The cost of making addi- 
tional positives was $468.50 each. The 
whole project was figured to distribute the 
cost of making the negative among ten sub- 
secribers, making the cost of the micro- 
copies of the 315,000 pages $413.50 or 
$.13 per 100 pages. 

The work of microcopying this great 
body of material was carried to a success— 
ful conclusion by Dr. T. R. Schellenberg, 
in spite of many obstacles. The material 
consisted of unbound typescript pages, some 
of them carbon copies on thin paper, to- 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





gether with a number of printed pamphlets. 
When the material was first filmed, the op- 
erative employed to feed the pages skipped 
some of them or fed them into the Recordak 
machine in an irregular way. Moreover, the 
machine itself was not set to take care of 
the photographic differences between light 
and dark copies, or between bond and onion— 
skin paper. When a check up of the first 
film copy of thé NRA records revealed im- 
perfections, an effort was made to correct 
them by cutting the microcopy strips and 
interspersing freshly photographed strips 
of film in the faulty places. But this 
film strip, when used for making positive 
copies, did not prove satisfactory. Dr. 
Schellenberg therefore recopied the whole 
file of NRA hearings, with the technical 
help of members of the staff of the Rec- 
ordak Corporation, which was very generous, 
not only in solving technical difficulties, 
but also in contributing free of charge the 
machine and film for the second copying. In 
calculating and assessing the cost of the 
project, the extra copying operation was 
not taken into account, for it was the re- 
sult of conditions which need not be dupli- 
cated in the future, and is charged off to 
experiment and experience. 

A project to make widely available 
copies of all early printed English books 
has been under discussion among librarians 
for several years, and has led to a number 
of cost calculations. The project differs 
from that of copying the AAA and NRA hear- 
ings, not only in its greater magnitude, 
but also in the greater expense that must 
necessarily be incurred in travel and su- 
pervision, and in setting and resetting the 
camera to take volumes of different sizes 
at different reduction ratios. A memoran- 
dum on cost was drawn up at the office of 
the Joint Committee in September, 1935. 

For purposes of calculation it was assumed 
that the total number of pages would be two 
million, and the average page size an oc- 
tavo in twelve-point type. The calculation 
was made to cover two alternatives in re- 
duction ratio--l2 diameters and 21 di- 
ameters, and the alternative of using 45mm. 
or 16mm. film. The memorandum on cost, 
while rather elaborate, serves to illus— 
trate the behavior of so many of the vari- 
ables in microcopying that it is here 
quoted textually: 

The first cost of making an original 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


negative of the estimated two million pag- 
es is hard to calculate and not greatly de- 
pendent on reduction ratio, for so much of 
it will be travel, supervision, apparatus 
and labor of incalculable efficiency. 
pmese costs, exclusive of film cost, could 
be calculated for two million pages as fol- 
lows: 

AD OTMCOS Glas 5's eres 6 Os 000.00 


Fare, supervision .. 6,000.00 
Miscellaneous ....<. 2,000.00 
ARGUE sxXe-lerl Zaewotels taliotte eeee 2,000.00 
LOR CM Ets wiatsis's ars lorete ate «L065 000.00 


Other costs are variable with the 
number of feet of film used. On 35mm. film 
in the third position, reduced 12 diame- 
ters, 2,000,000 pages (750,000 linear feet 
of book) would go on approximately 62,500 
feet of film plus 10% for margin, bringing 
the total roughly to 70,000 feet. On 16mm. 
film in second position, reduced 21 diam- 
eters, 2,000,000 pages (1,000,000 feet of 
book) would go on 48,000 feet of film plus 
10% for margin, bringing the total to 
56,000 feet. The cost for the film and the 
processing for 55mm. film, if figured at 
$.04 a foot, is $2,800; for the 16mm. filn, 
mipuredsat $.025 a foot, it is $1,325. 

Resuming our calculations, the dif- 
ference in reduction ratio and film cost 
becomes increasingly important as the num- 
ber of subscribing libraries increases. The 
possibility will also appear that very sub- 
stantial reductions in the processing cost 
of the film may become available if the 
footage runs high enough. However, main- 
taining the constant calculation of $.025 
for the 1émm., $.04 for the 35mm. film the 
costs for subscribing libraries would stand 
as follows: 


10 libraries ....$4,880 at 12 diameters, 
35mm. film; or $.24 per 100 pages 
$3,257.50 at 21 diameters, 
16mm. film; $.165 per 100 pages 
libraries ... $3,840 at 12 diameters, 
35mm. film; or $.20 per 100 pages 
$2,292 at 21 diameters, 
16mm. film; or $.115 per 100 pages 
libraries ... $3,520 at 12 diameters, 
45mm. film; or $.17 per 100 pages 
$1,808 at 21 diameters, 
16mm. film; or $.09 per 100 pages 


RO 


40 


By the time forty libraries are 





133 


reached, the cost of film and processing 
has become dominant and any economies in 
these costs would be felt immediately. 

The effect of differences in proc— 
essing costs when the number of subscribers 
reaches 40 is shown by recalculating the 
costs at maximum and minimum processing 
figures ($.055 maximum and $.025 minimum for 
35mm. film; $.05 maximum and $.0225 minimum 
for 16mm. film). 


A0 Libraries) Jon Gl,(S00at 
35mm. film; or $.09 per 
and processing at $.025 

$4,397 at 


12 diameters, 
100 pages (film 
per foot) 
le diameters, 
35mm. film; or $.22 per 100 pages (film 
and processing at $.055 per foot) 
(Difference of $647 between high and 
low processing) 
$1,672.32 at 21 diame- 
ters, 16mm. film; or $.085 per 100 pag-— 
es (film and processing at $.0225 per 
foot) 
$3,167 at 21 diameters, 
1émm. film; or $.16 per 100 pages (film 
and processing at $.05 per foot) 
(Difference of $1,494.68 between 
high and low processing) 


Microcopying "Reprint Costs" 

Microcopying, like book production, 
as has been stated, gives rise to both 
"first cost" and "running cost." The 
first cost in microcopying is compounded 
of two factors, the first of which is 
largely labor, and is dependent upon the 
number of pages copied, regardless of the 
area of film used; the second is film and 
processing, and is dependent upon the area 
of film used, regardless of the number of 
pages copied upon it. The labor cost of 
photographing is roughly analogous to the 
composition cost of book manufacture; it 
varies with the number of pages rather than 
the number of words. The running cost 
(that is to say, the cost that depends upon 
the number of copies) is simply the area 
cost of the first copy, multiplied by the 
size of edition. 

Another kind of cost is present in 
book manufacturing, the "reprint cost." 
This ieathes "first cost" ofspringingsoutee 
second edition. The reprint cost is less 
than the first cost of the first edition 
of a book provided plates are made from 
the type, or the photo-offset metal sheets 


134 





preserved for a second run. But the re- 
print cost in book manufacture, regardless 
of these economies, is always substantial. 
In microcopying large footages the reprint 
cost is nil. No special expense is in- 
curred in production if, when 10,000 feet 
of film have been distributed to each of 
ten subscribing libraries, an eleventh li- 
brary comes along a year later and asks to 
have an eleventh copy made for it. The 
cost of making the eleventh copy is simply 
the normal film—and-processing cost. For 
this reason microcopying offers remarkable 
elasticity in the distribution of material. 
There need never be an "overprint," made 
at the risk that no one will wish to buy 
it. This quality of microcopying, it must 
be remembered, is present only to the de- 
gree that the footage involved in a single 
order is large enough to obtain low proc-— 
essing prices. 


Short Footages in Unique Copies 

An application of microcopying 
that is already developing, and promises 
to have great utility in the future, is the 
making of microcopy negatives of books or 
periodical articles upon the order of in- 
dividual purchasers, whether research work— 
ers or libraries. The installation of ef- 
ficient photographic equipment may make it 
possible for a large library to make its 
resources generally available to readers 
anywhere at the price level of microcopy- 
ing. 

If the number of pages to be cop- 
ied per day in a library should be large 
enough to allow the continuous operation of 
the machine, the operating cost would rise 
above that of a long run of uniform mate- 
rial only to the extent that readjustments 
of focus became necessary in changing from 
books of one page size to books of another 
'Size. The processing costs could still 
stand at the level of long rum work. An 
additional charge would be incurred in cut-— 
ting up the strips and mailing the short 
lengths to the various purchasers, but 
this type of service, in the experience of 
the Recordak Corporation (which cuts up 
long strips of bank records and mails them 
to individual banks) would not lift the 
costs to an entirely new level. Bookkeep- 
ing costs would appear, but it seems quite 
probable that on large-scale work the 
price level could be held down within 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





striking distance of the price of long- 
footage orders. 


Microcopying and Long-Distance Use of Li- 
braries: the "Bibliofilm Service" 


The most interesting effort to de- 
velop a service of this kind has been made 
by Mr. Atherton Seidell, Dr. R. H. Draeger 
of the U. S. Navy Department and Miss 
Claribel Barnett, librarian of the Depart— 


ment of Agriculture Library, Washington, 


D. C. In November 1934, Miss Barnett es-— 
tablished the "Bibliofilm Service" in the 
Library of the Department of Agriculture. 
The date is an important one in the history 
of microcopying applications. 

Miss Barnett has described the ad- 
ministrative routine of the Bibliofilm 
Service in an article in The Camera vol. lL, 
no. 5, May 1935, pp. 327-328, as follows: 


The procedure begins "with the suppli- 
ance of a 5" x 5" slip or card speci- 
fying the article desired--one such 
slip for each and every article, and 
each slip carrying the name and ad- 
dress of the customer. The slips are 
returned with the finished films. At- 
tendants take the slips, search the 
library, send the books to the photo- 
graphing room, there each article is 
copied on a continuous Strip of Tiilim, 
leaving spaces between for cutting. 
When all the day's orders are photo- 
graphed, the film will be developed, 
fixed, washed and dried, then cut up 
and each sequence attached to its 
proper slip and mailed to the cus— 
tomer or delivered by hand as it may 
be. Prepayment for the service is 
urged when possible, this to save ac- 
counting, etc., and a deposit of funds 
which may be drawn upon is possible. 


The film copies or "filmstats" as 
they are called are priced at $.10 for each 
article not exceeding ten pages, and $.05 
for each additional ten pages. The in- 
creasing use of the Bibliofilm Service is 
evident from a report in Agricultural Li- 
brary Notes for June, 1955; the number of 
pages copied per month rose from 470 in No- 
vember 1934, to 6,597 in May 1965. 

Miss Barnett writes that the rates 
during this experimental period have not 
covered the cost of keeping the records 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


135 





and correspondence, but that the clerical 
cost may be materially lessened after the 
procedure has been better established. 
Moreover, the clerical costs as they stand 
are not greater, she believes, than those 
connected with the lending of books, for 
such costs as charging and discharging 
loans, or following up loaned volumes by 
correspondence to secure their return, are 
avoided. Studies of the cost of interli- 
brary loans made by the University of Cal- 
ifornia--though challenged by some libra- 
rians--set the cost of each loan at well 
over a dollar, and offer strong confirma- 
tion to the views of Miss Barnett. Schol- 
arship stands much indebted to her for the 
well-—conceived initiative. 

Other libraries have installed 
equipment for making microcopies, but the 
cameras used do not have the efficiency of 
the Draeger camera used by the Department 
of Agriculture Library. The price for mi- 
erocopies at the Library of Congress, the 
New York Public Library, and Yale Universi- 
ty Library is set at $3.00 per 100 expo- 
sures; at two pages per exposure, this 
amounts to $1.50 per 100 pages. Hunting- 
ton Library at San Marino, one of the first 
to install equipment, charges $5.00 per 100 
exposures, or $2.50 per 100 pages. A large 
microcopying machine has been installed in 
the Preussische Staatsbibliothek, but no 
quotations on service have been received 
by the Joint Committee. 

Since installation of equipment in 
America has already reached three of the 
largest libraries in the country, it is 
safe to say that at this very moment micro- 
copies of several million volumes of books 
and periodicals are already available to 
research workers at a price ($1.50 per 100 
pages) not much in excess of the normal 
price paid for books. Since the Wilson 
Union List of Periodicals in American Li- 
praries will inform any reader anywhere 
whether a given volume of a periodical is 
available at one or another of the libra- 
ries offering this service, scholars are 
now able to arrange with speed and certain- 
ty to have copied for them periodical ar- 
ticles not accessible in their own insti- 
iGUbLON GS. 


j Microcopying and Copyright 


+ 
> 


f 


While these innovations have of- 
fered a mechanical means of increasing the 





working power of scholars throughout the 
country, it has been necessary to prepare 
the legal ground for their use. For most 
of the learned journals from which schol- 
ars are likely to seek microcopies are cov— 
ered by copyright. With books it is other- 
wise; most of the rare and inaccessible 
books are probably the old books, on which 
copyright has expired. But the whole ques-— 
tion of photographic copying in its rela- 
tion to copyright has been full of uncer- 
tainties. 

Discussion with specialists in 
copyright problems showed that the law has 
been highly elaborated in court decisions 
to define the limits of so-called "fair 
use" when copyright material is republished 
BORE PLOtisb, MOU Oba lenOmCOuUrte decir slonsmeap— 
ply to the situation of the research worker 
who copies out notes from a copyrighted 
work in the course of his research. The let- 
ter of the statute would seem to indicate 
that the scholar with a fountain pen copy- 
ing paragraphs out of an article in a 
learned journal was engaged in technical 
violation of the copyright statute, but it 
seemed evident that the courts would neces-— 
sarily make a distinction between the kind 
of copying that is done in the course of 
research, when the copied matter merely en- 
ters a scholar's note file, and the reprint— 
ing of material for sale or distribution. 
The librarians had felt for some time that 
the uncertainties of the law hampered them 
in some measure in laying down policies in 
the use of the photostat, and it was clear 
that the extension of microcopying, because 
of the lower price level, would increase 
the problem. 

When the text of the new copyright 
law was under discussion in Washington in 
the spring of 1955, the suggestion was made 
that specific reference in the law should 
cover photographic copying for scholarly 
purposes; but the legal advisers of the 
publishers, while quite willing to have the 
photographic copying devices used to help 
schollarssin research, felt that such aypro— 
vision of the law would necessarily be so 
complex that it might either defeat its own 
purpose or undermine the whole structure of 
Ciejopiaealielalig.< 

The whole subject was explored ina 
generous and sympathetic spirit at a meet-— 
ing of librarians and book publishers. Mr. 
H. M. Lydenberg of the New York Public 


136 





Library, Mr. Milton Ferguson, chairman of 
the book-buying committee of the American 
Library Association, and Dr. Andrew Keogh 
of Yale University Library met with Mr. 
Frederic Melcher, chairman of the copy- 
right committee, and the board of direc-— 
tors of the National Association of Book 
Publishers. As a result of correspondence 
and conference to which a number of libra- 
rians contributed, a "gentlemen's agree— 
ment" on photographic copying for research 
purposes was drawn up and signed by Mr. W. 
W. Norton on behalf of the National Assoc-— 
dation of Book Publishers and by Dr. 
Robert C. Binkley on behalf of the Joint 
Committee on Materials for Research, 

The main principles of the agree— 
ment are, first, that photographic copies 
of parts of books or periodical volumes 
may be made by a library and delivered 
without profit to a purchaser in lieu of 
loan or manual transcription. The para-— 
graph was phrased to apply to the copying 
of a complete article from a periodical 





METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


volume, but it would not apply to the mi- 
crocopying of a whole volume or file of a 
periodical. The second principle is that 
the photographic copy is not to be a sub- 
stitute for the purchase of the material; 
it can be taken for granted that the known 
practices of research scholars in the col-. 
lecting of material for research will guide 
the intelligent application of this prin- 
ciple. The third' principle ies thate umes ei 
brary which carries out the above princi- 
ples in good faith is not to be held liable 
for violation of copyright law, but that 
responsibility for any possible infringe- 
ment shall rest with the purchaser of the 
photographic copy. Subsequent correspond— 
ence has shown that some photographic copy-— 
ing problems arising in libraries are not 
explicitly covered by the agreement, but 
the main principles are sufficiently clear 
to justify the development of microcopying 
services in lieu of inter-library loans. 

The text of the agreement is repro- 
duced herewith: 


Correspondence and Agreement on the Photographic Copying by 
Libraries of Copyrighted Material 


Mr. W. W. Norton, President 


National Association of Book Publishers 


547 Fifth Avenue 
New York, New York 


Dear Sir: 


May 25, 1935 


On behalf of the Joint Committee on Materials for Research, I 


write to thank you for the consideration your organization has given to the 
increasing importance of the problem of conscientious observance of copyright 
that faces research libraries in connection with the growing use of photo- 
graphic methods of reproduction. Not so long ago the scholar or student con— 
tented himself with pencil or ink transcripts of passages in the books and 
periodicals he consulted in connection with his studies. The increased use, 
first of the fountain pen, then of the standard typewriter, then of the port— 
able typewriter, developed a corresponding increase in the number and amount 
of transcripts made for this same purpose. Within the past few years, the 
use of photography, the photostat, and now the 16 or 35 millimeter film cam— 
eras have added to the amount, the extent, the speed--and the problems—-of 
this reproduction. 

We realize, of course, that we can speak only on behalf of the 
publishers, libraries and research workers of this country. The problem is of 
importance also in connection with foreign copyrighted books, particularly the 
publications of academies or learned societies and the unofficial periodical 


_ 


ee eee, 


ee 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 137 


press printing the results of research. As to such books and periodicals, 
the foreign publisher or copyright owner is the final authority. We feel, 
however, that the common interests of both groups would make it fair for us 
to assume that the practice approved by American publishers and libraries 
would satisfy their brothers in other countries. 

We are told that from time to time instructors in various 
schools and colleges have reproduced in one way or another extensive por- 
tions or whole chapters from copyrighted textbooks, which have been sold or 
given to their classes as substitutes for the textbooks. We see how keen an 
injustice and how severe a harm is done to the owner of the copyright by such 
practices, and we participate with you in the condemnation of such obvious 
violations of copyright. 

The indication you have given of what publishers and authors, 
as owners of copyright, can suggest to archives offices and museums as a 
guide to a code of fair practice in connection with the commendable form of 
public service rendered by photographic methods of reproduction is so clari- 
fying that we suggest it be put in the form of an agreement and published. 


Very sincerely yours, 


(signed) Robert C. Binkley 
Chairman, The Joint 
Committee on Materials 
for Research 


May 27, 1935 


Dr. Robert C. Binkley, Chairman 

Joint Committee on Materials for Research 
Western Reserve University 

Cleveland, Ohio 


Dear Dr. Binkley: 

We deeply appreciate your desire to work out a code of fair 
practice which will protect the rights of authors and research workers. As 
publishers we naturally do not wish to impose restrictions which might hamper 
students in collecting research material, but on the other hand it is neces— 
sary for us all to face this problem realistically and not permit the rapid 
extension of photocopying to lead to a disregard of the fundamental principles 
ObeCcopyrLe hic. 

The results of the conference in our office, attended by Mr. 
Lydenberg, Mr. Ferguson, and Dr. Keogh and members of our committee, have 
been discussed with Mr. Frederic Melcher, Chairman of the Association Copy- 
right Committee, and by our Board of Directors. We are happy to have the re- 
sults of these conferences put in the form of an agreement and published with 
this correspondence. 

Very sincerely yours, 


(signed) W. W. Norton, President 
National Association of 
Book Publishers 


138 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





The Joint Committee on Materials for Research and the Board 
of Directors of the National Association of Book Publishers, after confer- 
ring on the problem of conscientious observance of copyright that faces re- 
search libraries in connection with the growing use of photographic methods 
of reproduction, have agreed upon the following statement: 


A library, archives office, museum, or similar institution owning 
books or periodical volumes in which copyright still subsists may 
make and deliver a single photographic reproduction or reduction of 
a part thereof to a scholar representing in writing that he desires 
such reproduction in lieu of loan of such publication or in place of 
manual transcription and solely for the purposes of research; pro- 
vided 
(1) That the person receiving it is given due notice in writing 
that he is not exempt from liability to the copyright pro- 
prietor for any infringement of copyright by misuse of the 
reproduction constituting an infringement under the copyright 
law; 
(2) That such reproduction is made and furnished without profit 
iO) skicsiellae Joyy claxes Shasrealimohestous meyetiaye, abt). 
The exemption from liability of the library, archives office or museum 
herein provided for shall extend to every officer, agent or employee 
of such institution in the making and delivery of such reproduction 
when acting within the scope of his authority of employment. This 
exemption for the institution itself carries with it a responsibility 
to see that library employees caution patrons against the misuse of 
copyright material reproduced photographically. 


Under the law of copyright, authors or their agents are assured 
of "the exclusive right to print, reprint, publish, copy and vend the copy— 
righted work," all or any part. This means that legally no individual or in- 
stitution can reproduce by photography or photomechanical means, mimeograph or 
other methods of reproduction a page or any part of a book without the written 
permission of the owner of the copyright. Society, by law, grants this exclu- 
sive right for a term of years in the belief that such exclusive control of 
creative work is necessary to encourage authorship and scholarship. 

While the right of quotation without permission is not provided 
in law, the courts have recognized the right to a "fair use" of book quotations, 
the length of a "fair" quotation being dependent upon the type of work quoted 
from and the "fairness" to the author's interest. Extensive quotation is obvi- 
ously inimical to the author's interest. 

The statutes make no specific provision for a right of a re- 
search worker to make copies by hand or by typescript for his research notes, 
but a student has always been free to "copy" by hand; and mechanical reproduc— 
tions from copyright material are presumably intended to take the place of hand 
transcriptions, and to be governed by the same principles governing hand trans— 
Cri puLon. 

In order to guard against any possible infringement of copyright, 
however, libraries, archives offices and museums should require each applicant 
for photomechanical reproductions of material to assume full responsibility for 
such copying, and by his signature to a form printed for the purpose assure the 
institution that the duplicate being made for him is for his personal use only j 
and is to relieve him of the task of transcription. The form should clearly in- J 
dicate to the applicant that he is obligated under the law not to use the mate-— 
rial thus copied from books for any further reproduction without the express 
permission of the copyright owner. ; 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 





139 


It would not be fair to the author or publisher to make possi- 
ble the substitution of the photostats for the purchase of a copy of the book 
itself either for an individual library or for any permanent collection in a 


public or research library. 


Orders for photocopying which, by reason of their 


extensiveness or for any other reasons, violate this principle should not be 


accepted. 


In case of doubt as to whether the excerpt requested complies with 


this condition, the safe thing to do is to defer action until the owner of 
the copyright has approved the reproduction. 

Out-of-print books should likewise be reproduced only with 
permission, even if this reproduction is solely for the use of the institution 


making it and not for sale. 


"Publishing" Short Runs of Material by 
Microcopying 

Onesol the most intricate, and at 
the same time the most important, of the 
problems encountered in the use of micro- 
copying is its possible substitution for 
publication. 

In its simplest form, such a sub-— 
stitution for publication would take place 
automatically if a library which offers 
microcopying service has in its possession 
unpublished material, and the probable pur- 
chasers of such material are aware of its 
existence and availability through the 
usual bibliographical guides. For in- 
stance, if a typescript copy of a monograph 
should be deposited in the Library of the 
Department of Agriculture, and listed or 
given notice in the learned journals, the 
Public Affairs Information Service, and 
other bibliographical guides, it would be, 
in effect, "published" to the degree that 
scholars would be willing to buy and use 
MAC OCC Pie S Olen Libr. 

But in such a case each individual 
purchaser would require that the book be 
photographed anew. A new negative would 
be produced for each "sale" of the book. 

Would it be possible to organize 
the distribution of microcopies of such a 
work in a way that would take advantage of 
the labor-saving that can occur when a 
number of positives are made from a single 
negative? Of course, if the material in 
question fills a large enough film footage, 
the additional copies after the first neg- 





(signed) Robert C. Binkley, Chairman 


Joint Committee on Materials 
for Research 


W. W. Norton, President 
National Association of Book 
Publishers 


ative are available with present technique 
at a price lower than the cost of the first 
negative. But in the case of a short strip 
of film--a few inches or a few feet--there 
is at present no way of taking advantage of 
the theoretically low cost of making a num- 
ber of prints from a single negative in the 
production of positive prints to order. 
What is the amount and behavior of such an- 
ticipated economies? What is the differ- 
ence between the cost of making a negative 
microcopy from a book and the cost of mak-— 
ing a positive from a negative? And what 
is the cost of maintaining a catalogue, and 
shelving or storage system for film nega- 
tives? 

It has been shown that, for long 
footages, the cost of making a positive 
from a negative is not greater than the 
processing cost of the same footage of neg— 
ative. Even short items can be produced 
as negatives at the low processing cost of 
the long footage, because a large number 
of items are copied on a long roll, and the 
roll subsequently cut up. But if positive 
copies are to be made from the short scraps 
of negative, the. processing cost rises. 
Short scraps of negative give rise to high 
costs in making positive copies. But the 
cataloguing and storage expenses for short 
pieces are as high; sper item, as for Long 
strips. Consequently for short items it 
will be wasteful to save the negative, for 
long items wasteful not to save it. The 
dividing line is probably the 100-foot 
reel, which may mean a unit of 2,000 pages. 


140 





For the shorter items--and this 
means for most scientific literature——pres-— 
ent apparatus will not justify the expense 
of holding a negative for the sake of mak-— 
Ine A eMUMD er Oise POS ita se txcOMe shame Uli aeloty 
a large number of microcopies of a scien- 
tific article are to be made from the same 
paper copy, the paper itself may wear out 
in the repeated photographing. "Publica- 
tion" by microcopy methods would put upon 
a book the same amount of wear that would 
take place if every reader used the same 
copy. Librarians who have administered 
"reserve book rooms" for large university 
classes know how quickly a book will wear 
out under constant use. 

This is the problem to which Dr. 
Watson Davis of Science Service has de- 
voted a vast amount of intensive thought 
and planning. The solution suggested by 
him is an important contribution to the 
use of microcopying, and to the organiza— 
tion of the distribution of scientific 
literature. He proposes that the negative 
made from an original typescript, or in- 
deed a negative made from a published ar- 
ticle or book, should take the form, not 
of a length of film strip but of a rectan— 
Sale Ome 1am ee Sides Oat CO pein@ Teal elelind Cenc eee mC cial 
catalogue. It is deemed technically pos-— 
sible to put 150 pages of microcopied ma- 
terial on a 3" x 5" card (a 70mm. film ecut 
into 5" strips would measure 2 3/4" x 5"), 
Even if the number of pages that can be 
copied on such a card is materially less 
than 150 pages, the essential value of his 
suggestion lies in its answer to two of 
the most difficult problems in microcopy— 
says Kilaione, sliggwls, lene ey Slatonew, Supe wut 
roll LLlmsis motleasy. to Store, citimustepe 
placed in a small compartment or container, 
the container labelled, and then the col- 
lection of containers and films controlled 
by a catalogue. If the film copy of the 
article or book can become itself the cat- 
alogue card, the problem of cataloguing and 
ScTOrIneeddis a pOeCaT Ss .mm adsSme Seb Micm nina shame Ce 
vantage of his plan. The second advantage 
appears in connection with processing. To 
make a positive print from' a short strip 
of motion picture film is more difficult 
than to make a print from a single rectan- 
gle of film. His plan should tend to make 
"reprint costs" for short items behave as 
if the items were long, and at the same 
time eliminate a heavy cataloguing and 
storing charge. 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 








It has been suggested by several 
writers that the future may see whole li- 
braries copied on film, and the negatives 
stored in such a way that positive copies 
from any of them can be run off on demand. 
It is sometimes thought that when a library, 
in responding to a demand for a microcopy 
of an item, makes a negative copy, it 
should make a positive from the negative, 
send the positive to the purchaser, and re— 
tain the negative to make positives for 
other purchasers. This is the procedure 
that the technique of photography suggests 
as normal. But how does it fit into the 
practical administration of library re- 
sources? 

In the analysis of library costs, 
it was established that cataloguing and 


Shelving of books are items of library ex- 


pense that approach in magnitude, or even 
pass, the cost of the books themselves. Mi- 
crocopying in lieu of inter-library lending, 
when organized like the U. S. Department of 
Agriculture Bibliofilm Service, imposes no 
extra cataloguing charges on the library. 
The film service simply uses the existing 
catalogue and shelving system. If an ef- 
fort is to be made to use a negative more 
than onee, the library must control its 
negatives by means of a catalogue system 
that will parallel its book catalogue, 
growing with the growth of the collection 
of negative films. This extra cost can be 
made up only if it results in substantial 
economies. 

Dr. Davis has received from the 
Chemical Foundation a grant which he will 
use to develop the apparatus necessary to 
put his plan into effect. When the appara-— 
tus is ready, the day will have arrived 
when microcopying is technically suited to 
do for the intellectual world what publish-— 
ing has hitherto done, with immeasurably 
greater elasticity and at a fraction of the 
cost. "Lhe long erolivor tiimeywislieorol abil, 
remain as the best medium for the micro- 
copying of long items, because it will do } 
for the microcopies what binding does for 
a book-—keep the series in its fixed order. 
The card negative will serve for the short 
items, arranged in an open order, with new 
items placed between items already in the 
fies 


The Problem of Standardization of Equipment 


and Reduction Ratio 
A memorandum by Mr. Verneur E. Pratt 


Sera = 


SS a eee 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


of the International Filmbook Corporation, 
and a series of letters and memoranda by 
Dr. Watson Davis, call attention to the 
vital importance of standardization in the 
development of apparatus for microcopying. 
Mr. Pratt writes: 


If certain rumors and actual 
reports are to be considered authen- 
tic, there is an alarming disparity 
in the use of films. Some are plan- 
ning microcopies to be made on 16mm. 
film; others upon 35mm. film, still 
others upon widths not usually con- 
sidered standard. The minifications 
vary from 12 to 24. Some projec-— 
tors and cameras now being designed 
and readied for the market are adopt- 
ing 55mm. film with the customary 
double row of sprocket holes. Others, 
with a view of salvaging more of the 
available area, are planning on the 
use of film on which but one row of 
sprocket holes is punched. A camera 
concern is developing a reading ma- 
chine which uses no sprocket holes 

Furthermore, there is as yet 
MOMS DanGarc lz eb tom Oierblstadne sO. 
separation of dockets, folios or pag- 
es. There is no uniformity of treat- 
ment in locating pages on the film-- 
some photographing newspaper pages 
vertically but book pages horizontal- 
ly. Some are ignoring frame lines 
and others attempting to squeeze a 
certain number of pages into the def- 
inite standard film size. 

Unless this situation is im- 
mediately controlled through action 
of a standardization committee, this 
lack of uniformity is going to cost 
mildtons of dollars to' correet. in 
the early days of electric lamps each 
manufacturer brought out his own 
specifications of the base. The re- 
sult was that electric lamps had to 
be especially made to fit each manu- 
facturer's sockets. No one has been 
able to calculate the millions which 
this foolish lack of standardization 
Cost. 


The problem of standardization 
brings to the fore the important fact that 
microcopying involves not only the manufac— 





141 


ture of the copies themselves, but also 

the distribution of reading equipment. The 
cheaper the reading equipment, the more 
easily will it be distributed to a number 
of scholars sufficient to render practical 
the large-scale utilization of microcopying 
in research. But at the same time, the re- 
duction in the price of reading equipment 
means an increase in the cost of microcop- 
ies, because reading machines that will 
handle the high reduction ratios that go 
with low-cost micro-films will be more ex- 
pensive than reading machines that handle 
only low reduction ratios. The manufactur- 
ing cost of reading equipment increases 
with the reduction ratio of the microcopy 
it is prepared to handle, and with the area 
of reading matter laid before the reader at 
a time. The magnifying power, field of 
vision, and the light intensity (which de- 
termines the amount of contrast in the pro- 
jected image) are the three optical ele- 
ments of the reading equipment which seem 
to have the controlling position in the de- 
termination of costs of equipment. There 
are other important points to be noted in 
reading equipment, such as ease of loading 
the film, or ease in passing from one page 
to another, but these can be ignored for 
the moment. They are independent of 

the choice of magnifying power, field of 
vision and light intensity. 

As soon as the cost of reading ma-— 
chines is introduced into the analysis of 
microcopy costs, the remarkable fact emerg- 
es that some of the fundamental elements of 
publishing accountancy are still present, 
but with the situations of the publisher 
and reader reversed. If a reader buys for 
#100 a reading machine which he uses to 
read 1,000 pages, he is paying $.10 a page 
for reading equipment; if he gets 100,000 
pages of reading matter, the cost per page 
of his reading equipment is only 1/10 of a 
cent. His reading machine is a "first 
cost," and the footage of film he acquires 
or uses in it a "rumning cost." If he cuts 
this first cost by purchasing a projector 
that will not handle microcopies of 23 di- 
ameters reduction, but will accept only mi- 
crocopies-of 9 ory 12 -dlameters reduction, 
his running cost of reading matter will rise 
because he must pay more per page for the 
MC ROCOPLeS ela eCUUSs Darcie S Gmc O SIGE ibis 
contenting himself with a machine that will 
show only a small area of projected image 


142 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





at a time, or give a lower light intensity, 
he may retain the low running cost of his 
reading matter, but must accept a sacri- 
fice in' the legibility factor. 

The situation may be clarified by 
an illustration taken from transportation. 
The railway (like publishing in printed 
form) imposes a heavy first cost in making 
every trip. But this cost per passenger 
will fall with the number of passengers, 
exactly as the cost per reader of printed 
books falls with the number of copies sold. 
The railway company makes the initial in- 
vestment, the passenger pays only for what 
he uses, just as the publisher carries the 
Libba wCOsS bang emis Ole pub ld Shinar cad 
the book buyer limits his investment to 
what he can actually use. The system will 
only be economically justifiable if a 
large number of people wish to go to the 
same place at the same time, just as pub- 
lishing is only economically feasible if 
the saleable edition is large. 

The quantitative relationship be- 
tween the higher cost of projectors to 
read film at high reduction ratios and the 
lower cost of the film itself is easily es-— 
tablished from the calculations made above 
of the cost of microcopying the English 
books printed before 1640. Basing this 
calculation on the estimates of the cost 
to the libraries of film when forty libra- 
ries purchase copies, two quantities can 
be plotted against each other on a graph. 
On one axis is the cost differential be- 
tween high power and low power projectors; 
on the other axis is the cost differential 
between high reduction and low reduction 
film. The figures for the film are ex- 
pressed in thousands of pages, the figures 
for the projector in dollar differences be- 
tween alternative reading machine prices. 
Every 30,000 pages will justify an expen- 
diture of an additional $25.00 for a read- 
ing machine. 

The passenger has an alternative: 
he may buy a car. In that case he will 
have a fixed cost per mile for gas and oil, 
like the cost per page of books purchased 
PnanIcrocopys Lorm. Sihws "CosG wwiselbericon— 
stant, no matter how much he travels. He 
can go where he will, whether anyone else 
is going there at the same time or not, 
just as the microcopy reader can get any 
item in micrucopy form, whether other read-— 
ers want it or not. He is limited only by 


TABLE XLIV 


GRAPH TO SHOW THE AMOUNT OF MICROCOPYING 

THAT WILL JUSTIFY THE EXPENDITURE OF ANY 

GIVEN INCREMENT IN THE PRICE OF A READING 

MACHINE NECESSARY TO READ REDUCTIONS OF 

21 DIAMETERS RATHER THAN REDUCTIONS OF le 
DIAMETERS 








Scale of dollars, representing either the difference 
in price between high and low power reading equipment 


or the difference in price between microcopies of 


film pages up to 210,000 pages 








80,000 


60,000 90,000 120,000 150,000 180,000 210,000 


Number of book pages microcopied on film which will make 
the difference in purchase price of the microcopies 
amount to any sum up to $175.00. 


the road network, as the reader of micro- 
copies is limited only by the resources of 
libraries offering microcopying service; 

and in this respect both car owner and mi- 
crocopy reader are users of public proper- 
ty. And the microcopy, like the automobile, 
if used on a large scale, may change the 
whole design of a compartment of life. But 
the development of microcopying in lieu of, 
or as a supplement to, printed book publi- 
cation, like the development of the automo- 
bile in its relation to railway travel, 

will attain its technological possibilities 
only to the degree that a wide market cuts 
the first cost of the reading equipment, 

the individual owners of it distribute this 
first cost over a large footage of film, land 
the libraries offer the services that ren— 
der both of these conditions possible. 

This comparisom brings) tovliehntvat 
once the tremendous difficulty and the su- 
preme importance of standardization at an 
early stage in the development of the new 
devices. Let us imagine, as a kind of a 


met aia lan lang, 


et Dean paren rl ee ela ee a ier 


re oe 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


fantasy, that the automobile in its 
early stages had been some kind of a 
machine that required for its opera- 
DIChMa me SDeCLaAle kind or road. Then let 
us suppose that in one part of the 
country roads were under construction 
that would serve for one make of auto- 
mobile, while in another part of the 
country roads were built for another 
make of car, with road and automobile 
so related that the machine built to 
go on one road would not go on anoth- 
er} That is the kind of problem fac-— 
ing the intellectual world at this 
moment in the standardization of mi- 
crocopying. Shall we build a projec- 
tor that will read any microcopied 
film, whether card or film strip, 
whether broad or narrow, whether 

a high or low reduction ratio? Con- 
ceivably such projectors can be de- 
Silenced,  DULewill "not theilr® cosu be so 
high that wide distribution will be fore- 
stalled? Or shall we have several makes 
of projector, each adapted to a particular 
kind of microcopy film, in which case the 
utility of each to the reader will be lim- 
ited even though the price be less. Or 
shall libraries and others standardize 
their microcopying in such a way that one 
simple projector will serve for all pur- 
poses, im which case there is a risk that 
the chosen standard may not be the best, 
and almost a certainty that if it is well 
adapted to one type of material (as a long 
file of newspapers) it will be ill adapted 
to another type of material (as a short 
typescript monograph). 

There are at present too many un- 
knowns to permit the solution of this in- 
tricate equation. But the facts and prin- 
ciples already set forth will serve at 
least to eliminate some of the unknowns, 
and to simplify in some measure the prob- 
lem of standardization. 


in 


Essentials of Design for Reading Equipment: 


(a) Length of Line 
Into this labyrinth there are many 


approaches. The analysis might begin with 
estimates of buying power of various cate- 
gories of institutions and readers; with 

estimates of the number of pages likely to 
be copied and hence the comparison of the 

relative importance to be attached to film 
prices and equipment prices; with a calcu- 





143 


lation of the probability that the essence 
of the matter lies in the short items on 
the one hand, long footages on the other; 
or with an anticipatory measurement of the 
proportions which various classes of read- 
ing matter, such as newspapers, books, man— 
USCrapits Cl, aWiel holds ta eG nes CompuUsmors 
microcopied material. But there is one 
seemingly trivial dimension which appears 
TOME WEL bere uOnOCcCuUpy. a acrucialsposiuLorm 
in determining policy, and that is the 
length of the line of print, typescript or 
manuseript. "This unit, it has been noted, 
always bears some relation to size of print 
of type, and also to size of page. Bad 
typography or writing may make the line too 
long for the print, but there will always 
be some limits to the variation. Small 
type is almost invariably set in shorter 
lines than large type, and if a large page 
is to be used with small type, the type ap- 
pears in the form of columns on the page. 
The resolving power of a photographic emul- 
Sion and process is exhibited in the repro- 
duction of a letter, the labor cost of mak- 
ing an original negative microcopy is a 
quantity that varies with the number of 
pages, the processing costs of film vary 
with footage, but the technological meet— 
ing point of microcopying and microreading 
devices is found in the line of reading 





matter. 


Copying and reading devices are not 
incompatible though they differ greatly in 
the way in which they render the size of 
print or of page. A given piece of film, 
when put in one projector, may yield an 
image equivalent to 8-point type, in an- 
other projector an image equivalent to 
16-point type. The same film might show 
in one projector a spread of two pages laid 
before the reader's eye at once, in another 
projector one page only, and in a third 
projector only the upper half of a page. 
These differences would not render the 
projectors incompatible with each other, 
nor with the microcopying camera. But if 
a camera makes a microcopy in such dimen- 
Sions that the projector will display from 
it an image that does not show full lines, 
the two are absolutely incompatible. 

Already there have appeared in the 
development of microcopying apparatus sev-— 
eral outstanding examples of this incom-— 
patibility. The Recordak newspaper projec-— 
tor projects an image from a full frame of 


144 








a lémm. film or from one quarter of the 
"double frame" of a 35mm. film. A newspa- 
per page, copied on the Eastman Recordak 
machine, is projected and read, a quarter- 
page at a time. There is no incompatibil- 
ity here, for the quarter-page of the news- 
paper holds several columns, and no lines 
of reading are broken off in the middle. 
But the Library of Congress microcopies of 
manuscripts from foreign archives have 
been made to the number of over a million 
'pages on 55mm. film, and most of them in 
the "first position" noted above, i.e., 
one page to a double frame, with the lines 
running full across the film. These film 
copies are incompatible with the Recordak 
projector. The Carnegie Endowment for In- 
ternational Peace, acting on the advice of 
the writer, made copies of the Paris Peace 
Conference papers of Colonel House at the 
Yale University Library. These were copied 
in the same position as the Library of Con- 
gress documents from foreign archives, and 
are equally incompatible with tne Recordak 
projector. The NRA hearings were copied 
on 16mm. film in the same position, i.e., 
with lines running full across the filn, 
but since the full width of the film is on- 
ly half the width of the 35mm. film, the 
Recordak projector will display a full page 
of the typescript, not cutting any lines. 
The present tentative design of a 
projection apparatus to be made by the In- 
ternational Filmbook Company seems to show 
that less than the full area of a book page 
is to be projected. About a dozen lines of 
print appear on the screen at a time. Then 
the film is moved to bring the remainder of 
the page into view. The projector is com- 
patible only with film that has the lines 
running transversely across the film strip, 
aswel pos. tons. 5 and 3--or indeed in 
the multiple arrangement suggested by Mr. 
Pratt. (see above.) To conform to this 
type of reading apparatus, Mr. Pratt recom— 
mends as 


locating all pages vertically on the 
film, with the lines of the printed 
matter at right angles to the length 
Oe Chew minnie Shaya ls perntinieo tars 
ple projectors without revolving ob- 
jective lenses and gates." 


Another projector designed by the 
International Filmbook Cornoration will 








METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


permit the reading of lines running in ei- 
ther direction, and will expose a variable 
film area by substituting lenses and con- 

densers. 

The Bibliofilm Service photograph- 
ers, using the Draeger camera, copy their 
pages in the second position on 35mm. film. 
If they should copy in the first position, 
their film could not be read in a Recordak 
projector; the copies they are making in 
the second position cannot be read in the 
International Filmbook Teledex, but can be 
read in the International Filmbook Optigraph 
if the rolls are long enough; if they should 
copy in the third position their film would 
be readable in either the Recordak or Film- 
book projector. 


Essentials of Design for Reading Equipment. 


(b) The Page Rectangle 
Another given quantity, independent 


of any choice made by the designers of mi- 
crocopying or reading equipment, is the 
general proportions of the normal page of 
reading matter. Ordinarily the page, wheth— 
er of typescript, manuscript or print, sea 
rectangle of which the vertical dimension 
is greater than the horizontal by a factor 
of 25%. to. 50%... 821/202 x11 eGo mea 
other standard sizes from folio to duodec-— 
imo carry these proportions. The propor- 
tions are independent of the size of the 
page, and equally independent of reduction 
ratio in photographing or enlargement ratio 
in reading. They are related to length of 
line, because the line always corresponds 
to the short side of the page rectangle 
(except for pages set in more than one col- 
umn). 

Taken in conjunction with two other 
fixed elements of the problem, namely, 
(1) the standardization of the width of the 
film and (2) the advantage of using the full 
area of the film the page rectangle, the 
proportions of the page rectangle become 
important determinants of design. This fact 
becomes especially noticeable when a fixed 
frame camera is used for copying. 

The ordinary moving picture frame 
on 35mm. film is a rectangle 1" x 3/4", 
with the long side across the film; the 
"double frame" used in the Leica, Contax, 
and Ludwig cameras exposes an area 1" x 
1 3/8", or 18 x 1 2/2", withe they shortecic. 
across the film. Edwards Brothers of Ann 
Arbor is prepared to furnish microcopies of 





{ 
4 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


Kuropean books made with a single frame 
camera; the equipment at Yale, New York 
Public Library, and Huntington Library, is 
of the double-frame type. With a single- 
frame camera, pages can be copied in the 
second or third position without loss of 
film area; with a double-frame camera pag- 
es can be copied in the first and second 
position without loss. But if a single- 
frame camera is used to copy pages in the 
first position, or a double-frame camera 
to copy them in the third position, from 
one-third to one-half of the area of the 
film is wasted. 

These considerations do not apply 
to copying cameras with changeable frames, 
but so much copying equipment is already 
set up with fixed frames, and especially 
with the fixed double frame, that any 
standardization of projectors that would 
force users of double-frame cameras to 
waste from one-third to one-half of their 
film in order to render their copying com- 
patible with reading equipment would incur 
disadvantages in distribution. This fact, 


145 
r 
translated into terms of design, seems to 
call for projectors that can be adjusted to 
read lines of print that run across the 
film as well as lines that run along the 
aipleluyts 

This element of the design of a 
provecio: Ls Wop a parb of the opulcal sys— 
tem, but of the mechanical structure of the 
apparatus. 

So far as the optical system is 
concerned, the important fact to notice is 
that pages always appear as rectangles, of 
which the short side is the line of print. 
TIwo-page rectangles may be photographed on 
one film rectangle, but the initial propor- 
tions of the page rectangle will still con- 
trol the proportions of the rectangle of 
film used in copying them. If the camera 
has a fixed frame area, either single-frame 
or double-frame, the proportions of the film 
rectangle are determined by the camera. But 
even if the camera is adjustable and can 
expose a larger or smaller length of film 
at a time, the proportions of the page will 
Sully comtrol tie proportions of, they tim 





Single Frame 35mm. Film 


Page in First Position 
diameters reduction 





TH 


Wasted 





Wasted 


Second Position 
diameters reduction 
NOOOOM OOOO On O08 0non on Oona 00goGn of 00 onn fc ono0o000 


oonononoOoooonnoonoonon ooo ooO oO ooo ooo ocooCoKO nn naeeonoo0n 00000 


Third Position 
diameters reduction 








Double Frame 45mm. Film 


Page in First Position 
diameters reduction ear 





HDoonmooono oon onmMonogoognnooegoe0non00en 0n0 00 000 [0000900 900 


Second Position 
diameters reduction sens 
onnonooOO OP OOOO OnFOoOOOAAaGnn Ono onon Ono oOononoOoOoOnDoOnDoo 





Third Position 
diameters reduction 









146 


image, which will always be a rectangle 
with the long side one-third to one-half 
longer than the short side. 


Essentials of Design for Reading Kquipment. 
(c) the Aperture 

The aperture of a lens is usually 
measured as a diameter of the lens circle: 
but in connection with the problem of pro- 
jecting pages it must be given another 
meaning. The aperture dimension that is 
effective for reading microcopied pages is 
the length of the long side of a rectangle 
with the proportions of a page (roughly 1" 
x 11/2"), that can be inscribed in the 
lens circle. The word "aperture" as used 
below is a lens area covering a rectangle 
of film measured along its long side. The 
aperture thus defined need not correspond 
in size to the page rectangle on the film, 
nor to the film rectangle which holds the 

image of one or two pages, nor the single 
frame or double frame that has its dimen- 
sions set by the camera. But in the ratio 
Ola SmLOngusd Cem tbOn cS chorte sid emate wale: 
still follow the general proportions of a 
page. The aperture is to the projector 
what the frame of film is to the camera. 

It is possible to read a large 
frame of film with a small aperture if the 
film frame is moved in front of the aper- 
ture, so that the different parts are pro- 
jected successively. This is true whether 
the frame of film has been used to copy 
one or two or even more pages. If the 
long side of an aperture equals the long 
side of a page rectangle, the page can be 
read without moving the film; if the long 
side of the aperture equals the short side 
of the page rectangle the page can be read 
by moving the film in front of the aper- 
ture; if the long side of the aperture is 
less than the short side of the page rec-— 
tangle, the film and projector are incom- 
patible, and the page cannot be read at 
all, (unless, indeed, the page happens to 
be set up on columns, and the long side of 
the aperture is equal to the width of the 
microcopied column). 

To consider an extreme case; two 
pages can be photographed (in the third po- 
sition) on a single frame of film. One 
page of the original print will correspond 











METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


Go nalts) franemot tt lm ht Sa Oongecuce 
will be 3/4", its short side 1/2"; the 
length of line will be 1/2". The aperture 
required for reading this film need be on- 
ly 1/2" (1/2" x 3/8") but in reading this 
film with a 1/2" aperture, the film must be 
moved successively into four different po- 
sitions: first, to read the top sor whe 
first page; then to read the bottom of the 
first page; then to read the top of the 
second page; and finally to read the bot- 
tom of the second page. An aperture of 1" 
(1" x 3/4") would make it possible to read 
both pages without moving the film; an 
aperture of 1 1/2" (1 1/e" x 1") would not 
only permit the reading of both pages at 
once but would also lay before the reader's 
eyes, at the same time, two frames of film, 
with four pages of reading matter. 

These principles are used in the 
Recordak newspaper projector. A newspaper 
is reduced sixteen diameters on 55mm. film. 
The aperture of the lens projects from the 
newspaper page rectangle (1" x 11/2") an 
area roughly 1/2" x 3/4". The film is 
moved in front of the aperture in such a 
way that the reader has before him at any 
time a projection of about a quarter of the 
newspaper page. Since the newspaper print 
is set in columns, this arrangement does 
not violate the principle that the aperture 
must be sufficient to exhibit the full 
length of a line. But in the case of the 
streamer headlines, running full across the 
newspaper page, this principle is violated, 
for the reader cannot have before his eye 
at one time a full streamer headline. This 
is an admitted inconvenience. It is over- 
looked in the Recordak design because a 
very small proportion of the reading matter 
of a newspaper consists of streamer head- 
lines. 

The dimensions of length of line 
and the proportions of the page rectangle, 
when considered in connection with the 
standardized 65mm. and 16mm. film define 
certain specific dimensions in aperture as 
fixed alternatives in design. 

An aperture 1 1/2" will display the 
long side of a page rectangle taken on a 
double frame of 35mm. film. An aperture 
of 1/2" will display the short side of a 
page rectangle taken on 16mm. film. The 





4. If the page rectangle is a multiple of 1" x 1 1/2"--corresponding to the page size 6" x 9", the long 
side of the aperture rectangle (a) and the diameter of the lens circle (d) will always be so related 


that d=1.2 x a. An aperture 
lens diameter of .6", etc. 


of 1" goes with a lens diameter of 1.2"; an aperture of 1/2" with a 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 





intermediate steps in the series are show 
on the chart on the following page. 

These dimensions for aperture are 
final in the sense that there is no reason 
for building apparatus that will use an 
aperture intermediate between them. There 
is no use for an aperture of more than 
11/2" for 35mm. film; there is no use in 
making the aperture larger than 3/4" un- 
léss it is made a full inch; there is no 
stopping point between 1/2" and 3/4". An 
aperture of 5/8" is wasteful; it can ac-— 
complish nothing that is not equally well 
accomplished with an aperture of 1/2". 
These conclusions follow from the fact that 
the standard dimensions of the film and 
the normal proportions of a page rectangle 
are fixed quantities. 


Essentials of Design for Reading Equipment: 
(d) the Enlargement Ratio 

With these apertures accepted as 
fixed alternatives for reading equipment, 
it remains not only to decide between them, 
but also to decide upon an enlargement ra-— 
GeOre 





The enlargement ratio has only two 
fixed points that can be deduced from oth- 
er fixed elements of the situation. It 
should hardly be less than six diameters, 
for then it would overlap the possibili- 
ties of a'rect optical magnifying by read- 
ing glass equipment. It is shown above 
that the cost of photosensitive surface on 
film is about four times that of the paper 
Surface. If a 6" x 9" page is to be 
copied in the first position on 35mm. filn, 
with a reduction of 6 diameters, it could 
be copied at no greater materials cost on 
paper in a reduction of 3 diameters. The 
paper copy, legible with a reading glass, 
would offer marked convenience in storage 
and filing. Equipment for making such pa- 
per copies is in sight. It would seem, 
therefore, that no enlargements of less 
than six diameters need be considered. Pos-— 
sibly the same argument in favor of paper 
could be extended to cover enlargements of 
eight or even of ten diameters, but for the 
moment it can be concluded that there is 
somewhere a minimum enlargement below which 
projection equipment is umnecessary, and 
this minimum is certainly six, and possibly 
10, diameters. 

The upper limit of enlargement is 
dependent upon the range of the high reduc-— 





147 


tion vratiog. it Loey are set at 16 for 
newsprint and 24 for typescript, then the 
reading equipment will follow by disregard- 
ing the possibility of enlargement in a 
higher degree. If the reduction ratio 
should be pushed up--as some experimenters 
propose--to 40 diameters for typescript, 
the projector will have to follow it. These 
considerations fix the upper and lower lim- 
its for enlarging power in reading equip- 
ment. Between them there are no fixed sta- 
ACM Sim 

The enlargement ratio is, however, 
related in an important way to aperture. 
For instance, to take an extreme case, it 
is evident that a 1/4" aperture in a ma- 
chine that would make enlargements of only 
10 diameters would have a very restricted 
use; the octavo book pages or typescript 
pages that would have their length of line 
brought down to 1/4" would have to pass 
through a reduction of 24 or more diame- 
ters. The projected image of such a micro- 
copy, if enlarged only 10 diameters, would 
be less than half the original size and 
might therefore be illegible. On the other 
hand, a machine with a 1 1/2" aperture set 
to make enlargements of 20 diameters, 
while it would be useful in projecting a 
full newspaper page at once, would be waste- 
ful in projecting microcopied books that 
had passed through a reduction ratio of 20 
because it would show more pages than nec-— 
essary, and would be equally wasteful in 
projecting book pages that had been en— 
larged only 10 diameters, because it would 
raise the size of the print to poster size. 

There is another and equally sig- 
nificant relationship between aperture and 
enlargement ratio. The cost of a lens and 
condenser system increases with the enlarge- 
ment ratio, but diminishes with the aper- 
ture. Thus an optical system with large 
aperture and low enlargement ratio will 
cost the same as an optical system with 
small aperture and high enlargement ratio. 
If the present design of a certain reading 
equipment renders it too costly, the cost 
can be reduced by redesigning it either for 
smaller aperture or for lower enlarging 
power. If reading equipment at present 
available has insufficient enlarging power, 
the design can be altered to give a higher 
enlarging power without. altering the cost, 
but only by diminishing. the aperture. 

It might be argued that enlargement 


148 


TABLE XLV 


CHART OF APERTURE AND CORRESPONDENCE TO FRAME OF FILM 


Aperture in} Film Width 


Inches 


e/a 


uw" 


3/4 


3/4" 


1/2" 


3/eM 


1/4" 


in mm. 


35mm. 


55mm. 


55mm. 


16mm. 


16mm. 


16mm. 


16mm. 


Correspondence of Aperture 
to Frame of Film, or to 
Page Rectangle on Film 


Long side double frame 


Short side double frame, 
or long side single frame 





Short side of single frame 


Long side of double frame 


Short side of double frame 


Short side of single frame 
(page copied in second or 
third position) 





One-half of short side of 


single frame (pages copied 
in third position) 





Reduction Ratio when 6" x g!" 
Page is Copied for Reading 
with this Aperture 


6 diameters reduction to read 
one page; 9 to read two pages 
at a time 


9 without moving film to 
read page; 6 if °fidmeis 
moved for reading 


9 if film is moved for read-— 
ing page; 1e without moving 
film for a page 


12 without moving film; 18 
to show two pages at a time 


le if film is moved; 18 
without moving film 


18 if film is moved; 24 
without moving film 


24; film must be moved 
for reading the page 


ee ne a Oa 


_- Soa . — 





TABLE XLV 149 





Aperture 6 diameters 9 diameters 
OOOONOKO 900g nonOn OMA AnAnAoOnoO fF fFonoOoOoO Oooo oOonoO0o00 


opoo0gneFoonon oon ann oan nnn anno o0 ono o0Oo0oO 000000 















Aperture 6 diameters 9 diameters 





goong0ndgngnoangnn oon nanan noa nang naA Aeon naaaAnAaAnaaAAA0a0cno 


Aperture 9 diam, 12 diam. 
NNOOOMADOOOODOOOOFOAOOnNAOAOoOAOnOAOoAoOAAoOoOo00 


Noongn oon oon 00g fF 090 00G0cCd0n0nG 000000 o0RT e00 00 





= ant Camere OT 0 Le se pee ee 
CMON OR CM OTOLUN ONO SON OMOMROMOMOMOMORANG 


PGA in | 16mm. film 


















A oriure mG ernie 18 diam. 
'ifol (IN in Cie Oe Oo ORO OS oe Oe oe OOS ose Oey 


cae 2 


Aperture 18 diam. 24 diam. 
(a) {el {a} fe) fey fe} fo) fol fe) (oe) po) fe) to. al 





16mm. film 


eee eee ee ee ee ee Oe Oe OO ee 


16mm. film 





150 





ratio can always be increased by bringing 
the lens nearer to the film, and setting 
the screen further from the lens. Thus a 
very cheap projector will make enlarge- 
ments of 40 or more diameters by throwing 
an image on a distant wall. It does not 
follow, however, that a lens system de- 
vised to make enlargements of 10 diame- 
ters can be readjusted to make enlarge- 
ments of 20 diameters, because the low 
power lens will not give the requisite 
definition, and the lighting system will 
not give the requisite contrast. The man-— 
ufacturers of projectors will constantly 
be driven back to the alternative of sac-— 
rificing aperture for enlarging power, or 
enlarging power for aperture, or of sacri- 
ficing market if they standardize at a 
cost level that gives high enlarging power 
and large aperture. 

The terms of the equation to be 
solved by the industry are now set. It re- 
mains only to discover exactly which alter-— 
native aperture-enlargement combinations 
are available at various cost levels. What 
are the combinations of aperture and en- 
largement that can be sold for $40, for 
#60, for $100? The figures arranged 
above, showing the immense effect of the 
high reduction ratios in' cutting the cost 
of film will exert a pressure toward the 
adoption of high enlarging power with 
small aperture. The argument for low en- 
larging power and large aperture will turn 
on several points, of which the most im- 
portant probably are: 


1. That much equipment now in the hands of 
scholars is of the double-frame type, 
using 55mm. film, and with ordinary page 
copying this operates at the lower re- 
hoyercalere, sey walOleh- 

Coelhataenheshtenereducclons race sm mem ilCro= 

copying require a degree of skill that 

the scholar, an amateur in photography, 
often cannot supply. He can safely 

make mistakes in focusing, exposing, 

and processing at 10 diameters of re- 

duction, through the same errors would 

be fatal if he were making reductions 

of 20 diameters. 

That in short items made in unique 

Coples. Laborecost a SeSomail oh aa pro 

portion to materials cost that the price 

advantages of high reduction ratios are 

LIAS Ore yire 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 














4. That the large-scale ventures in copy- 
ing, such as the NRA and AAA code hear- 
ings, or the two million pages of early 
English books, which make the high re- 
duction ratios so advantageous, involve 
the expenditure of such large sums that 
they could sustain the manufacture of 
special equipment for reading the films 
made in such quantity. 


It is certain that there is a clear 
need for some reading equipment, such as 
the Recordak, that will handle reductions 
of 16 or more diameters by making enlarge- 
ments of 16 te 7 20 diameters. "Shouldgau: 
reading equipment be adapted to this use, 
or should there be an alternative line of 
projectors suited only to the reading of 
material copied in the zone of 10 diame- 
ters? If all reading equipment is to be 
adapted to the reading of material copied 
in the high reduction ratios, should it be 
designed to meet a low price level by sac- 
rificing aperture? The analysis given 
above may clarify the problem and thus as-— 
sist in its solution, but it cannot estab-— 
lish a proved answer. 

The four companies now most active 
in developing reading equipment are the 
Recordak Corporation, the Spencer Lens Com— 
pany, the Folmer Graflex Company, the In- 
ternational Filmbook Corporation, and Dr. 
Draeger of the U. S. Navy. Leitz, Bausch 
and Lomb, and Spencer Lens have projectors 
that can be used for projection reading, 
though not specifically designed for it. 
Leitz has a combination enlarger and pro- 
jector. The Graflex is working on a com- 
bination cémera and projector. Spencer 
Lens Company and Dr. Draeger are using the 
single-frame aperture of one inch; the 
Recordak an aperture of 3/4"; the Interna- 
ELonaliat wimpook Conporavionimasmuny ln cmnGo 
keep the cost of apparatus down by keeping 
the aperture small, while Dr. Draeger and 
the Spencer Lens Company are working to 
keep the price down by contenting them- 
selves with a low reduction ratio. The li- 
brarians in general, and especially Mr. 
Metcalf of the New York Public Library, and 
the promoters of microcopying in Washington, 
especially Dr. Draeger and Dr. Watson Davis, 
are working with the Bureau of Standards 
and with other agencies toward standardiza— 
tion. Lhe conc Mustonei Ss nO ieee econ mOuny 
the observer must testify to the clear 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 





intelligence with which those working in 
the field have envisaged the difficulty of 
the problem of standardization and have m- 
dertaken to grapple with it. 

Conferences held in Washington, De- 
cember 11 and 12, 1935, by various persons 
interested in the development of microcopy- 
ing resulted in the following tentative 
proposals which were then circulated for 
review, and approved on behalf of the Joint 
Committee on Materials for Research by the 
Chairman and Executive Secretary. 


iT 


There are three media of microcopy- 
ing to be considered: paper, 35mm. film and 
16mm. film. Since the use of paper does 
not involve the need for a projector, itcan 
be considered separately, but the great 
convenience in filing paper microcopies as 
compared with film, and the relative cheap-— 
ness of paper as against film, indicate 
that paper must not be ignored in the mi- 
crocopying problem. Dr. Bendikson of the 
Huntington Library, Dr. Dallas Irvine of 
the National Archives, and the Folmer 
Graflex Corporation in the development of 
their new copying camera are among those 
who have most carefully thought out the 
possibilities of microcopying on paper. 


Ih 


Related to the distinction between 
the 16mm. and the 55mm. film, but not iden- 
tical with the problem of the choice of 
film width, is the problem of reduction 
Pawo Lie hOmeproe jection. 

The International Filmbook Corpor- 
ation and the Recordak Corporation and the 
Recordak newspaper copying enterprises con- 
template the use of 35mm. film with a high 
reduction ratio (16 to 23 diameters, or over). 
Such high reduction ratios are also to be 
used on the 16mm. film. Lower reduction ra- 
tios are developed by users of the Leica 
camera and by the Bibliofilm Service of the 
Department of Agriculture, which uses the 
Draeger camera, especially in connection 
with the microcopying of short items. Any 
reading equipment can easily be equipped 
with reel-holding devices that will take 
either 16mm. or 55mm. film, and it should 
be a rule that designers are not encouraged 
to develop apparatus that will not permit 
the use of either width of film. In con- 
nection with the problem of enlargement 
ratio, a different situation exists. 





151 
LIT 


Projecting equipment, granted that 
it is adapted to both 16mm. and 35mm. filn, 
will vary in the following essential par- 
GaeG aes) 


a. It may be fixed focus or variable focus. 
The Recordak equipment has a fixed en- 
larging ratio of 22 diameters. The pro- 
jective Folmer Graflex equipment will 
have a varying enlargement ratio that 
can be set at will. Each of these meth- 
ods has its advantages and disadvantages. 

b. Some reading equipment throws the image 

on a screen from which it is reflected 

back to the eye; other equipment throws 
the image through a semi-translucent 
screen. The Recordak and Folmer Graflex 
will be of the first type. The translu— 
cent reading machines will be the Inter- 
national Filmbook apparatus, the Draeger 
projection reader, and possibly the ma- 
chine put on sale by the Leitz Company, 
and possibly the machine to be developed 
by the Spencer Lens Company. 

Reading machines differ in the size of 

aperture; that is to say, in' the amount 

of film they will enlarge for reading at 

one time. The Leica projector takes a 

double freme of 55mm, film, 1" x 1 1/e". 

The aperture of the Spencer Lens Company 

projector now contemplated will be a sin- 

gle frame, 3/4" x1"; that of the Recordak 
is one-quarter of a frame; and that of 
the International Filmbook Corporation 

may be even less. In general, there is a 

relationship between size of aperture 

and enlargement power, because if the 
aperture is only one-quarter of a frame 
it will not permit the reading of lines 
of print that have been microcopied to ex- 
tend across the full width of 35mm. film. 


IV 


Material that has been microcopied 
on 16mm. film at a high reduction ratio can 
be printed off on 355mm. film at a lower re- 
duction ratio; material that has been mi- 
crocopied on 35mm. film at a low reduction 
ratio can be copied off on 16mm. film at a 
hie heroducr lone nain lO. Cmte Ci msom © tmnyilie 
tal importance because it permits the pur- 
chaser of a low power projecting apparatus 
to order copies of any long run of 16m., 
high reduction ratio film (as the NRA and 
AAA records) in a form that he can read. 
Conversely, the purchaser of a small 


152 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





aperture, high reduction ratio projector 
can utilize material that was originally 
copied with a low reduction ratio on 45mm. 
Pic pees hasmicteprintedvoni once yre— 
duced size. 


V 


Taking into account the foregoing 
facts and possibilities, it would appear 
that the following developments in projec-— 
tion apparatus can be integrated into a 
common system and so arranged that the 
products of any microcopying enterprise 
could be made available to the projectors 
of any apparatus, with a few exceptions 
that will be noted: 


a. Double frame aperture, low enlarging 
power--Leica (now available but costly). 

b. Single-frame aperture, fixed focus, 1k 
diameter enlarging power, reading by 
transmitted light--—under development by 
Dr. Draeger. 

ec. One-half frame aperture, 22 diameter en- 
larging power, fixed focus, reading by 
reflected light--Recordak apparatus. 

d. Variable aperture, variable enlarging 
power, reading by reflected light--Fol- 
mer Graflex machine. 

e. One-quarter frame aperture, very high 
enlarging power, fixed focus, trans-— 
mitted light--International Filmbook 
Corporation development. 


VI 


Large-scale copying enterprises, 
such as the proposed microcopying of books 
published prior to 1640, can be made on 
either 35mm. or 16mm. film, either at a 
high reduction ratio (as 16, 20, 23) or a 
low reduction ratio (as 9 to 14 diameters). 
If the master copy is made in a low reduc- 
tion ratio, the possessors of Recordak or 
International Filmbook apparatus would 
merely purchase their film in a reduction 
on l6émm. film. If the original is made at 
a high reduction ratio on 16mm. film, the 
possessors of the Draeger, Leica, and pre- 
sumably Folmer Graflex apparatus would pur- 
chase it in the enlarged form on 35mm. 
film. The newspaper material now being 
copied by the Recordak Corporation in a 
reduction of 16 diameters can be read pre-— 
sumably on any one of four reading ma- 





chines: the Draeger projector will en- 
large it back 14 diameters, at some loss of 
legibility, but it will show the full 
width of the newspaper page; the Recordak 
projector will show only one-quarter of a 
page, but enlarge it above original size; 
the International Filmbook machines will 
presumably show less than one-quarter of 
the area of the newspaper page, but may 
give it even more enlargement than the 
Recordak; Folmer Graflex can presumably be 
adapted to the reading of this type of 
film. Microcopies produced like the NRA 
and AAA series can be read presumably di- 
rectly and without change on the Recordak, 
International Filmbook and Folmer Graflex 
equipment. Wor reading on the Draeger, 
Leica and Spencer Lens projectors, they 
would be reproduced for the purchaser in 
oSomm. width, making the reduction equiva-— 
lent to 11 2/2 diameters rather than co 
diameters. The short strips of film now 
being distributed by the Bibliofilm Serv- 
ice in reductions of 9 or 10 diameters can 
presumably be read on all projection appa-— 
ratus except that of the International Film- 
book Corporation, and doubtless if special 
instructions are given for the filming of 
such strips by the Bibliofilm Service they 
can be adapted even to the International 
Filmbook projector. 


VII 
is submitted that 


will provide for 
now being used, or 


Gonecihwisi ony eay 
this array of equipment 
the reading of any film 
likely to be used, with present: techniques, 
except such copies made at very high reduc— 
tion on multiple exposure on 35mm. film. 
Such copies would be legible only in the 
Recordak and International Filmbook appara- 
ore 


Film Storage and Durability 
To the extent that microphotography 


is used merely as a substitute for interli- 
brary lending, the question of the perma- 
nence of the film is not important. There 
is no doubt that its stability is suffi- 
cient for a span of years in which a schol- 
ar is carrying out a specific research 
project. His collection of material ,win 
microcopy form, will not go to pieces on 
eS meas. 

But i microcopying 1s to stakeethe 


a 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


153 





place of publication, or if libraries are 
to alter their general acquisition policies 
to give a large place to film instead of 
paper, the fundamental question of dura- 
Pitecy OL film must be met. "Dr. A. F. 
Kuhlman, in an article on the preservation 
of newspapers on film, has stated the is- 
sue comprehensively: 


Before we are ready to preserve news-— 
papers in film form, dependable and 
favorable answers must be found to a 
series of unsolved problems. First, 
the Bureau of Standards must settle 
the question of the life expectancy 
of the film record, The Bureau must 
determine: (1) the chemical and 
physical properties of the cellulose 
acetate film and of the emulsion and 
image produced upon it in filming rec- 
ords; (2) specifications for produc- 
ing and processing the film to obtain 
the most usable and durable produc- 
tion; (3) the effect upon the film 
copy, while in use or storage, of va- 
rious environmental conditions-—-tem- 
perature, humidity, light, human con- 
tact, etc.; and (4) specifications 
for storage and use. These points 
determined, it should be possible to 
predict, on the strength of verified 
data, the life expectancy of the film 
if produced, processed, stored and 
used under clearly specified condi- 
tions."9 


The Carnegie Foundation has made a 
grant of $5,000.00 to the Bureau of Stand- 
ards to study film durability, and the re- 
search was under way in the year 1935. 

The research had progressed sufficiently 
by January, 1936 to warrant the conclusion 
that cellulose acetate film, properly 
processed, offers a satisfactory prospect 
Omer el Dal lea ty). 

Moreover, the extraordinary evi- 
dence on durability that comes to light 
with the preservation of microcopied mate- 
rial from the siege of Paris must not be 
ignored. The reduction ratio, it has been 
established, was 32 to 39 diameters from 
newsprint. The film was probably a nitrate 
collodion base, less durable in all proba- 
bility than the acetate safety film. This 


5. A. F. Kuhlman: 
V, April, 1935, pp. 212-213. 





discussion of durability has been based on 
the assumption that photographers will use 
a film base more durable, and a reduction 
ratio less exacting, than that which has 
survived for 65 years from the siege of 
Renan. 

Correspondence with film manufac- 
turers and motion picture engineers is in- 
conclusive in establishing rules for the 
storage of safety film. Some advice spe- 
cial measures to insure controlled condi- 
tions of humidity and temperature. All are 
agreed that there is no special fire risk 
in the case of safety film. The Recordak 
Corporation does not recommend any special 
control of atmospheric conditions in the 
storage of film. The Bureau of Standards 
reports a probability that film will dry 
out if stored in atmospheres of deficient 
relative humidity, but dried film can be 
reconditioned and restored. The practical 
plan that was agreed upon as satisfactory 
at the Richmond meeting of a group inter- 
ested in microcopying (May, 1936) is to 
store film in a metal cabinet, keep a cheap 
hair hydrometer in the cabinet, and main- 
tain humidity by putting a sponge in the 
cabinet if it gets too dry. The storage 
of film will not impose upon librarians any 
significant special expenses. 

Assuming the permanence of film and 
the suitability of ordinary storage space 
for its preservation, the microcopying of 
documents for the sake of preserving them 
will be paid for by savings in storage 
space under certain conditions. Figures 
prepared by the Recordak Corporation indi- 
cate that it will pay to microcopy documents 
that are to be retained for fifty years if 
storage space costs are more than $.014 per 
cubic foot per year, and if storage space 
costs $.028 per cubic foot per year it will 
pay to microcopy documents that are to be 
retained for only twenty-five years. The 
costs of Recordak copying are less than the 
costs of the filing cabinets required to 
hold the original material. The microcopy- 
ing fixes all the documents in an unbreak-— 
able series. This is an advantage as a 
protection against loss of individual docu- 
ments through theft or carelessness; it is 
a disadvantage if a file is still active in 
the sense that new material ought to be in- 
terspersed between material already filed. 


ee Fe ee OAS et PES eS eS bot 
"Are We Ready to Preserve Newspapers on Films? A Symposium." The Libra 


Quarterly, 


154 


Since library space costs $.40 to $.50 a 
cubic foot for construction (see Chapter 
II), and gives rise to further costs for 
lighting and heating, it would appear that 
the interest charges and maintenance costs 
of library space would pay for transferring 
material from paper to film. It does not 
follow from this fact that such a transfer 
of material is desirable, but only that it 
is economically feasible. The reduction 
ratio in microcopying that would bring 
about this cost relationship is of course 
a high one--sixteen to twenty-three diameters.© 
The four methods in use for the 
storage of film are: '(a) storage in cans; 
(b) storage on reels; (c) storage in a 
cartridge; (d) storage in partitioned box- 
es. The cans, such as those sold by the 
Jam Handy Company of Chicago at $3.00 per 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS _ 





100, are small tin pill boxes. They keep 
each short length of film in place, but 
they offer no protection to the ends, edges 
or surface of the film. The reels provided 
by the Recordak Corporation are suitable 
for long' strips, just' as the pill» boxesrane 
for the small strips; they protect sides 
and surface. The International Filmbook 
Corporation has a foolproof cartridge that 
can be inserted in the projection reading 
machine; it protects ends, sides! and sur— 
faces. The Leitz Company sells small met- 
al boxes divided into twenty-five chambers 
each of which holds a five-foot roll of 
Leica film. 

The preservation of the film in- 
volves not only the intrinsic stability of 
base and emulsion, but also requires spe- 
clal care in the processing," tor tie end 





6. COMPARISON OF COST OF OBTAINING AND STORING FILM COPIES OF MATERIALS WITH 
STORAGE COSTS OF THE ORIGINAL MATERIALS 


Document size 8 1/2" x 11" (letter size). 


A standard file drawer holds approximately 3,500 letter size sheets and a four-—drawer file cab- 


inet about 14,000 sheets. 


A four-drawer cabinet is 15" wide 30" deep and 51" high. 


It consequently 


occupies 13 3/10 cubic feet of space without considering the aisle space required. 
Using a Recordak working at a 23-1 reduction 2,352 of the above documents can be photographed on 


a 100-foot roll of Recordak film. 


This roll of film costs $2.75 including development. 


Fourteen-thousand 8 1/2" x 11" documents will require slightly under six 100-foot rolls of 


Recordak Film, 


These will occupy 104 cubic inches or 6/100 of a cubic foot of space. 


These will cost $16.50. 


It is entirely practical to photograph 50 letter size documents per minute with the Commercial 


Recordak,. 


Consequently, to photograph 14,000 of these documents will require about 4-2/3 hours. 


At 


$.40 per hour, the labor cost of photographing 14,000 documents will be $1.87. 


HHH HH 


Using the above figures as a basis: 


13.5 cu. ft.-.06 cu. ft. = 13.24 cu. ft., which is the space saved by photographing the documents. 
The film and developing cost plus the labor cost is $16.50 + $1.87 = $18.37, which is the cost of 


obtaining the film copy. 


If the documents are retained for fifty years it will pay to Recordak them if storage space costs 


more than $.0278 per cubic foot per year. 
$18.37 = 50 = $.3674 
$.5674 13.24 = $.0278 


If the documents are retained for twenty-five years it will pay to Recordak them if storage space 


costs more than $.0555 per cubic foot per year. 


on Ce 


No allowance has been made in the above comparison for the aisle space required by the document 


files. 


sideration. We can consequently say that: 


Since at least 50% of the room space is required for aisles, this should be taken into con-— 


If the documents are retained for fifty years, it will pay to Recordak them if storage space 


costs more than $.0139 per cubic foot per year. 


If the documents are retained for twenty-five years it will pay to Recordak them if storage space 


costs more than $.0278 per cubic foot per year. 


es - 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


that no traces of the developing or fixing 
solutions remain on the film; and it may 
call for the protection of the surface 
from abrasion in use. It is a question 
whether the film surface should not be 
given a special hardening treatment to 
protect it from abrasion. The Interna- 
tional Filmbook Corporation claims that 
its projection apparatus is devised to pre- 
vent abrasion; the film is not in contact 
with glass while it is in focus in the 
projector. 

If the cellulose acetate film base 
and emulsion should ever prove to be in- 
sufficiently stable, there is a chance 
thac a microphotographic image on aluminum 
o—id be used. The firm of Siemens and 
Halske has developed a process which, as 
nearly as the writer can gather from avail-— 
able information, puts a photographic image 
on metal without a gelatine emulsion. The 
light, sensitive substance is an inorganic 
colloid, aluminum oxide. This is the "Seo 
Process." Negotiations for its introduc-— 
tion in America are under way. 
Microcopying of Newspapers' 

The use of microcopying in the 
preservation of newspaper files is of spe- 
cial interest to librarians for several 
reasons. 

a. The library's investment in 
storage space is greater in the case of 
newspapers than in the case of books. 

b. Newspapers printed since 1880 are 
perishable. Mechanical wood pulp paper 
began to be used about that time. A few 
newspapers today publish a special edition 
on permanent paper, and several suggested 
processes are in the field for preserving 
the wood pulp medium. The most tested 
process is that of the New York Public Li- 
brary; a sheet of transparent Japanese 
tissue paper is pasted with rice paste 
over both sides of each sheet of newsprint. 
The cost of this process is $.04 a page. 

c. There is no market supply of 
old newspaper files. Acquisition possibil- 
ities as well as prices of old files are a 
matter of accident. A library cannot plan 
an equipment of newspaper files with any 
assurance that it will be able to complete 
sles TOMuzb ale, 

From another point of view, news-— 
papers would seem to be among the least 





155 












































suited for microcopying, because the price 
of original files of newspapers is low in 
terms of printed area of page. In copying 
the NRA records, for instance, microcopy- 
ing distributed the copies at $.12 per 100 
pages, when the only alternative was hecto- 
graphing or mimeographing at $2.00 per 100 
pages. The Recordak Corporation and the 
New York Times Company have arranged the 
microcopying of nearly 90,000 pages of the 
New York Times for the five years 1914- 
1918 inclusive. The positive copies of 
this file are offered to purchasers at $.66 
per 100 pages. Since the bare subscription 
price of a year of the Times is only $18.00, 
or $.10 per 100 pages, it would seem at 
first glance that microcopying must be more 
expensive than original purchase. 


NRA and AAA hearings 
Price on paper $2.00 
Price on film adlz 


New York Times_ 
$.10 
-66 


In both cases the cost of binding and stor- 
age must be added to the price of the paper 
copies, and the cost of a projector or pro- 
jectors financed into the cost of the film 
copies. But when considerations of storage, 
perishability, and availibility are taken 
into account, the case for microcopying of 
newspapers is much better than the above 
figures would suggest. 

A comparison of the different pric-— 
es at which newspaper files may be pre- 
served brings into a comparative scale the 
three alternatives now confronting libra- 
ries, namely: 

1. Preservation by purchase and storage of 
original files which may be on perish- 
able paper in most cases, on permanent 
paper in a few cases. 

Preservation by photo-offset in a re—- 
duced scale on permanent paper. 

3. Preservation by microcopying on film. 


Be 


The figures on microcopying in 
items 17, 18, and 19 below do not take in- 
to account the important factor of "first 
cost" in making the original negative film. 
The Recordak project is financed on a risk 
basis like ordinary book publishing. Early 
estimates of the cost of the first nega-— 
tive set this. cost. figure at $.10 a foot, 
or $284.00 for the original negative. The 


7. The reader is referred again to the interesting symposium published by Dr. A. F. Kuhlman in The Li- 


brary Quarterly, V, (1935) pp. 189-214. 


"Are We Ready to Preserve Newspapers on Film?" 


156 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





TABLE XLVI 


COSTS OF ACQUIRING OR MAINTAINING ONE YEAR OF A NEWSPAPER FILE OF APPROXIMATELY 


18,000 PAGES PER YEAR, BOUND IN 24 VOLUMES 
(Based on dimensions and typography of the New York Times) 








I. Preservation of current file. (Not applicable to back files) 


1. Subscription price, unbound, newsprint edition ..........-. $18.00 (perishable) 


SENG S LP OL DANGTOE aes. cles cle ane eres i tof Aiakataee Rate he ie eats sl cesses 54000 (Cpertshabie) 
3. Newsprint edition, including binding ..... <2. a eranre cidwadess 72. 002(pertehammes 
4 Ragspaper cartion, dneludines plmddne wages st eelke citrercteks eters €170.00 (permanent) 
5. Cost of storage space for 24 volumes, minimum $48, 


maximum $72, "average ..sssces cess Pie iter OR OS DS $60.00 
(See figures in Chapter II) 
6. Total: for storage and file in permanent form '. tess es oe cee oOLU0 


7 Loval tore storage: ands file win impermean crniteweh OTMenepeteteieisictetetets $132.00 
8. Cost of treating with Japanese tissue to render a 
five mermanen Uses. keels © Seoats att nes Sue reels didsleleterete Crete $540.00 


9. Total cost of newspaper, binding storage, and 
Japanese paper treatment. J. ..e.ss sees oases cele assess stele sieemorecoe 


II. Preservation in photo-offset copy, on good paper, reduced to one-half size 


Whee 





(Applicable to back files) 


10. Twenty-five subscribers' (quotations of 1931) ..... f02+<.2) $L000.008 roneacn 
Diaby UO SC rl DOING merereterete ehotenelstatete totes Phehel hel enelst ot enone eioke tench oretenel stam A: Ole CLO) 
U2 One hundredesub seri Persie «rete retarstenetereiclenene cele eleasveledehen shexetevereneionommnco Ore OO) 
See LwOe HUNnGredesubis eri Dew Sie wereis ster eteteteteloreleisle tole ecsionehetenchel hersteker stein OOF Oe) 
4A PE OUTwAUNnIdredmSuUbSCrADeIr Smilers ste ereletaretetsicte erevelelersterstetciekenonetetele LOO 
15. Eight hundred subscribers ...... Sie elekete sole oe cJeherehete ohecsroieters (acOo 
16. Storage space for file (1/4 of full SIZES) Ccateta nee ee DOO 


Preservation in microcopy form. 
17. New York Times—Recordak price per year ..s%0.scsssssess cee pl coco 
18. Reduced 16 diameters, 1st position on 35mm. film. per- 


at 





forated on one side, 2840 feet of film 
Price of film (process positive) including processing 
At 5o1/2¢ pereroot Mish 2. cases ee cache se SLD GaOO 
Ate? 1/2¢ ver foot LOW eo petate tee sine: «0 6 TOO 
9. Reduced 20 diameters, 2nd position on same film as 
above, 1480 feet of film 
Price of process positive film including processing 


At 5 1/2¢ per foot Highs. esas de ole a peck aeinG soe 
At 2 1/2¢ per foot LOW-C- es ness o aisterstete oul ato 
cost of this negative is of course dis- than dis tripwaes suhslswidaS GacO\S cman lueeS 


tributed among the subscribers to the sets 
of film, who buy their positive sets at 
$120.00. The price of the processing is 
set at a figure well below the maximum for 
this kind of work, and the project has 
been set on foot in such a way that the 
sponsors take the risk that they may not 
sell enough positive copies to distribute 
their "first cost,™ and to expect, to gain 
a profit if the number of buyers more 


probable that in this instance the actual 
first cost is much in excess of $.10 a foot 
because of the labor of collating the file. 
A special condition that confronts 
those who would microcopy newspaper pages 
is set by the state of present equipment. 
The newspaper Recordak copies loose pages 
only. Each page of the newspaper is 
passed through the machine, first on one 
side, then on the other. In this way 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


157 





newspaper pages can be copied in sequence 
invthe "first position" 'onthe film, ina 
reduction of 16 diameters. If bound news- 
paper files are to be microcopied without 
disturbing the binding, two obstacles would 
have to be met. First, the binding of the 
papers often leaves the inner column ob-— 
scured because of the thickness of the vol- 
ume and the narrowness of the binding mar- 
gin. Second, a great amount of moving of 
the newspaper would be necessary if it were 
to be copied in the "first position" on the 
film. The camera would first take page 
one, then the whole bound newspaper volume 
would have to be moved the full width of a 
page to permit the copying of page two, 
then back again for page three, ete. If 
the bound newspaper volumes were to be cop- 
ied in the "second position," the reduction 
ratio would be greater because the whole 
height of the newspaper--22" in the case of 
the New York Times--would have to go on the 
same width of film that otherwise takes 
18", The New York Times microcopied in the 
first position is reduced only 16 diame- 
ters, in the second position it would have 
to be reduced 20 diameters. 

There are some newspapers with 
larger sheets than the New York Times, and 
some with smaller print. This is especial- 
ly true of old files. The experts of the 
Recordak Corporation testify that even 
these pages can be handled on 35mm. film, 
but some interested persons—-notably Dr. 
Thomas Martin of the Library of Congress—— 
feel that it is safer to count on using 
70mm. film for particularly difficult copy- 
ing operations. The newspaper file may be 
"bad copy" not only because of the large 
size of the page or the small size of the 
type, but also because of blurring or dis- 
coloration. Some of the Russian newspa— 
pers from the years of the Revolution, now 
stored in the Hoover War Library, are al- 
most illegible in their present form be- 
cause of this blurring of ink on a very 
poor quality of paper. However, with the 
example of M. Dagron and his microcopies 
in 32-39 diameters of reduction preserved 
from the year 1870, the technicians can 
probably be trusted to solve the micro- 
copying of bad copy without breaking too 
far from the cost levels indicated by the 
experiment with the New York Times. 

Another important element in the 
question of microcopying has to do with 





the attitude of the readers and research 
workers toward this form. In 1934 the New 
York Public Library did a great service to 
scholarship by utilizing microcopies of 
current months of the New York Times in its 
newspaper reading room. The weight of opin-— 
ion on the part of the readers was favora- 
ble to the use of films in preference to 
the newspapers themselves, largely because 
of the greater convenience in handling. The 
experiment was sufficient to justify the 
conclusion that readers will accept micro- 
copied newspapers in lieu of the original 
files. The new reading equipment being de- 
vised will increase the advantage of the 
process, because it will make it possible 
for a reader to make his own photostatic 
copy of a part of a newspaper page whenever 
he wishes. This will reduce the cost of 
photostat copies of parts of newspapers to 
a materials plus processing cost, for it 
will make the reader his own photographer, 
eliminating expensive labor in the photo- 
stat room. 

The present state of our knowledge 
regarding the advisability of depending on 
microcopying for the collection and pres-— 
ervation of newspapers can be summarized in 
a few statements: 


1. No library should at present embark on a 
large scale plan for the purchase, bind- 
ing and storage of newspaper files with- 
out taking into account the revolution- 
ary implications of microcopying. 

If, as now seems probable, an increasing 
number of newspapers offer their current 
issues to libraries in microcopy form at 
a reasonable price, the chances are all 
in favor of preferring the microcopies 
to a wood pulp paper edition on grounds 
of permanence. 


Microcopying and Library Cataloguing 
Another special use of the micro- 


copying process can be found in the copying 
of library catalogues. It has been stated 
above that the leading library problem of 
the present lies in the field of interlibra~— 
ry coérdination. It was the service of the 
last generation of librarians to bring the 
technique of collecting, accessioning, and 
cataloguing books to such a high point that 
a great library becomes in effect a running 
index, constantly brought up to date, of 
the world's knowledge. But as the demands 


158 





of scholarship increase beyond the powers 
of any library to supply them, the logical 
unit for the next stage in organization be- 
comes the interlibrary system. 

One of the instruments of interli- 
brary cooperation is undoubtedly the union 
catalogue. The largest project of this 
kind is "Project: B" of the Library of Con— 
gress, under the direction of Mr. Ernest 
Kletsch. The Library of Congress is fil- 
ing in a great filing system the author 
cards of the holdings of all American li- 
braries, especially the holdings of rare 
books. Already eight million cards are 
filed. But another use of the union list 
is in the field of library codéperation. If 
the libraries of a given region can cen- 
tralize information about their holdings, 
they can not only save the scholar a great 
deal of time in discovering whether or not 
a given title is accessible, but they can 
make their accession money go further by 
avoiding unnecessary duplication in pur- 
chasing. 

The need for "white collar proj- 
ects" under the Works Projects Administra-— 
tion in 1935 led to the development of a 
technique for using microcopying in the 
preparation of a union list. Projects 
drawn up and submitted to Public Works 
authorities in the autumn of 1935 in Cleve- 
land and in Philadelphia provided for the 
microcopying of all card catalogues of the 
libraries of each of these regions. The 
making of the cards for the union catalogue 
was then to be given to an army of typists, 
who would read the film copies of the cata- 
logues. The reasons for copying indirect- 
ly, through film, rather than directly 
from the card catalogues of the participat— 
ing libraries were, first, that the film 
copy could be made quickly, by one opera-— 
tor, using one drawer of cards at a time, 
and thus without disorganizing the func-— 
tioning of a catalogue room; and second, 
that the typing and checking operations 
could be centralized in one room, with ade- 
quate supervision. Of course the cards 
would be more accurately and quickly cop- 
ied if the film were enlarged by the avail-— 
able automatic enlarging machines to 3" x 
5" card size, but the importance of using 
as large a proportion as possible of Works 
Progress Administration money for wages 
made it necessary to resort to typing. 

However, @ better technique for 





METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 


using microcopying in the compilation of 
union lists was worked out by Dr. T. R. 
Schellenberg and Mr. Paul Vanderbilt in 
connection with the Philadelphia union list 
project. They proposed to microcopy a cat-— 
alogue, compare the microcopy film with a 
foundation catalogue of Library of Congress 
cards, designate the holdings indicated on 
the film copy by marking the Library of 
Congress card whenever the title was al- 
ready present in the foundation catalogue, 
and punch the film whenever there was no 
card present in the foundation catalogue. 
The Recordak Corporation machinery would 
then pick out automatically and reproduce 
photographically on 3" x 5" cards the film 
items that were punched for reproduction. 

Under some circumstances it may be 
advisable to reproduce a whole library cat- 
alogue on cards. Three photographic tech-— 
niques are available for this purpose. A 
number of cards can be laid out on a flat 
surface and copied on a large sheet of 
photostat paper with the ordinary photostat 
machine. The sheet can then be cut up in- 
toro" x 5" cards), andmchemcard Siiislc dems Osa 
the Dexigraph or photostat can be used to 
reproduce the cards one by one on 6" x 5m 
ecards of photostat paper. This is the 
process used by the Library of Congress in 
its Project B; it was also used by Yale 
University Library in duplicating its 
great catalogue for internal administrative 
purposes. Then the Recordak Corporation 
can take a 16mm. microcopy of a card cata- 
logue and enlarge it automatically on 3" x 
5" cards. The photostat and Dexigraph 
methods yield a negative (white on black) 
card; the Recordak method a positive (black 
on white) card. The costs run from $20,000 
to $30,000 per million cards. 

There is a possible substitute for 
a union catalogue that may make its way in 
the future in library administration. A 
great card catalogue may be copied on the 
ilémm. film, and the catalogue itself held 
by another library for reference and check- 
ing purposes. A group of such catalogues 
might be called an "assembled catalogue" 
rather than a union catalogue. The cards 
would be consulted in the reading machine, 
like any other microcopied material. The 
cost of making a microcopy of a card cata- 
logue, for this kind of use, would be only 
$500.00 per million cards, including labor 
costs. While it would be less useful than 


COST LEVELS AND APPLICATIONS OF MICROCOPYING AND PROJECTION READING 


159 





a union list in one respect--one would have 
to consult each library catalogue separate- 
ly to determine whether or not a given book 
were available--it would in another way of- 
fer an advantage over the ordinary union 
list, for the whole subject entry classifi- 
cations of a library catalogue would be re- 
produced. If, for instance, the film copy 
of the catalogues of the Library of Con- 
gress, the New York Public Library, and the 
Widener Library of Harvard University were 
on the floor of Columbia University Library, 
a scholar could check up quickly the hold- 
ings that each of these libraries had cat— 
alogued under a given subject head. This 
kind of use could not even be made of the 
great Project B union catalogue. The place 
of the "assembled catalogue" in library ad- 
ministration is untested. Another weakness 
in the use of the microcopy of a library 
catalogue as a basis for the organization 
of interlibrary codéperation is the impos- 
sibility of filing new entries between old 
ones. Perhaps the idea will prove most 
serviceable if it is combined with the 
union list idea. Libraries might procure 
microcopies of each other's catalogues, and 
then arrange for the exchange of catalogue 
cards on certain classes of future entries, 
or supplement the "assembled catalogue" (a 
number of copies of separate library cata- 
logues assembled in one room), with a true 
union list of current acquisitions, made 

by filing one card for each new title ac- 
quired by each of the codperating institu- 
tions. 


Photography as the Scholar's Amanuensis 
The analysis of costs and problems 
in the preceding pages has been devoted 
principally to the place of microphotog- 
raphy as a part of a library system. But 
the technique offers a variety of adapta- 
tions to the needs of individual scholars 
who may do their own work. Some scholars 
will find it useful to possess a camera 
that can be used for pictorial and document 
photography alike. For them the Leica or 
Contax, with its numerous accessory fix- 
tures, is the best implement for micro- 
copying. The selection of pages for copy- 
ing and the copying itself are merged as 
one operation, so that labor costs in pho- 
tographing do not appear; the photograph- 
ing is part of the research. The scholars 
who have taken microcopies of documents 








have often found it necessary afterwards 

to enlarge them on photostat paper. If 

the material is such that enlargements will 
be necessary, a step can be saved by making 
the original photograph on a narrow strip 
of photostat paper in the Graflex camera, 
soon to be placed on the market. Or again, 
reflection copying without a camera may fa- 
ecilitate the gathering of records by a 
scholar. 

Just as the scholars of the last 
generation found in general that it was 
desirable to be able to use the typewriter, 
so the scholars of the next generation 
will find it necessary to use photography. 
Just as each scholar works out his own note 
system, combining typescript and longhand 
notes, so the scholar of the future will 
make his combinations of typescript, long- 
hand, photographs on paper, and photographs 
onviiim. sMicrocopying, asa technique wn 
the hands of a man who does his own work of 
photographing and processing, is reduced 
to its bare materials costs. It offers the. 
possibility that a scholar, by purchasing 
microcopies from libraries and by making 
his own microcopies of excerpts from books, 
may build up organized accumulations of 
data that will resemble a private library 
in extensiveness, and a note system in its 
internal organization. Pictorial and tex- 
tual material can be fitted into the same 
file. That which scholars in the past have 
been able to do with the help of an amanu- 
ensis, the scholar of the future may be 
able to accomplish with photographic equip- 
ment. 

It is possible that the development 
of this use of photography-—-whether on pa- 
per or film--will have an effect upon the 
intellectual standards of scholarship, for 
the technique will automatically tend to 
distinguish between that kind of intellec- 
tual labor that is merely the gathering to- 
gether of documents and that which is the 
creative analysis of evidence, 


The Merging of Collecting and Publishing 


An even more sweeping change in 

the pattern of intellectual organization is 
to be anticipated from the full development 
of the possibilities of microphotography. 
The change that can be expected is one that, 
in a way, would restore a condition that 
passed out of existence with the invention 
of printing. For it was the technique and 


160 


METHODS OF REPRODUCING RESEARCH MATERIALS 





accountancy of printing that created the 
sharp distinction between the operations 
of collecting material and publishing. 
the days of the manuscript, copies of a 
book were made to order for a collector; a 
possessor of a book was in a position to 
have it copied when a copy of it was de- 
sired. There was hardly any distinction 
between "published" and "unpublished" ma-— 
terial. If a monastery maintained a 
scriptorium, and if its policy was to ac-— 
cede to requests for copies of its books, 
its whole library was, in a sense, "pub— 
lished" material. 

Precisely this situation returns 
to the degree that microcopying becomes 
generally available. A library with a col- 
lection of theatre programs, or pamphlets 
of the revolutionary war, or historical 
manuscripts may adopt the policy of making 
microcopies of its materials upon request. 
if iteadopts this policy, its whole col— 
lection becomes available to the world as 
if published. If the policy becomes wide- 
spread, so that one institution can expect 
to have its requests. honored at other in- 
stitutions, its collection can be per- 
fected and rounded out according to a log-— 
ical scheme. In that way, the making of a 
collection comes to resemble more nearly 
the preparation of a work of scholarship 
than a mere mercantile operation in the 
book market. Before the eyes of scholar— 
ship there looms a new unit of intellectu— 
al activity--the making of collections 
which will be "complete" within their pre- 
determined limits to a degree that has 
been hitherto impossible. And this new 
unit, the collection, ceases to be func-— 
tionally distinct from a publication. 

The more clearly this merging of 
collecting with publishing is achieved, 
the greater will be the place that scholar- 
ship must give to the bibliographical and 
abstracting services that will guide the 
research worker through the embarrassing 
array of materials that will become access-— 
ible to him. The fact that a given item 
is printed as a book has hitherto served 
to give it recognition in bibliographical 
guides from which unprinted items are ex-— 


In 


cluded. If this mechanical basis of dis- 
tinction loses its significance, the em— 
phasis upon intellectual bases of distinc-— 
tion must be greater than ever. 

Some librarians have raised the 
question whether it would not be wise to 
make up special bibliographies of micro- 
copies that are available. The problem 
they raise is important, but it leads be- 
yond the point they have in mind. If a li- 
brary has installed apparatus for microcopy-— 
ing and is willing to microphotograph its 
holdings on request, does not its entire 
holding become, in effect, available as mi- 
crocopied material? If manuscript material 
is microcopied in Europe and brought to 
America, it becomes a new item, a new re- 
source of American scholarship. But the 
same is true of a body of American manu- 
scripts that may be discovered in an attic 
and deposited in a library that offers mi- 
crocopying service. It is premature at 
this stage to do more than suggest how wide 
the new fields are in the science of libra- 
rianship that are now open for exploration. 
There isy however, one conclusion that can 
be drawn, even in the present state of the 
technique. This conclusion is that we may 
expect that the future will make the small 
libraries more important than they have 
hitherto been: in the intellectual organiza-— 
tion of the country. They will be able, 
not only to draw more freely upon the large 
libraries. in, the service of theiresciclars. 
but also to shoulder their share of the 
burden of maintaining the great archive of 
our civilization. Each unit in the vast 
library system can perform a task that will 
be proportionate to its resources, and yet 
fitted into the general scheme in a unique 
and useful way. The library may come to 
be, not only a depository of printed mate- 
rial, not only a collector of existing rec-— 
ords, but even a maker of new records. It 
may come to be a part of the function of 
the library of the future to reduce to 
writing information that would otherwise 
go unrecorded. There is no community so 
small that it does not offer to a sensitive 
mind aspects of human life that are worthy 
of record, and facts that should be en- 
tered in the dossiers of scholarship. 


